 "We have four-month-old mice that were diabetic and now are not," he added.
 The study is still in its early stages, as cautioned by Dr. Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the clinical and scientific department of the Canadian Diabetes Association.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, pointing out that these results are not relevant for those already affected by type 1 diabetes.
 The permanent secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Committee, Sara Danius, announced on Monday in a radio interview that the committee had given up trying to contact Bob Dylan directly to inform him of his Nobel Prize for Literature.
 Danius said: "Right now we are not doing anything. I have called and emailed his closest collaborator, who has replied very kindly. For the moment, that's it."
 Previously, Jamie Siminoff, CEO of Ring, pointed out that the company was born when he could not yet hear the doorbell from his garage store.
 He said he built a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said sales increased after he appeared on Shark Tank in 2013, when the show's panel of investors refused to fund the startup.
 Siminoff appeared on the commercial television station QVC in late 2017.
 Ring has also reached a transactive agreement with the competing security services company, ADT Corporation.
 While on the one hand there seems to be an experimental vaccine that can reduce mortality from Ebola, on the other hand no drug has yet been found that has clearly been shown to be suitable for the treatment of the existing infection.
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, initially showed promise in the field, but formal studies revealed lower efficacy than hoped for in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp was used as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a reference and compared it to the other three therapies.
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and recognizes the absolute need for the Olympic community to work together to create a safe environment for all of its athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that the best interests of our athletes and clubs, and their sport, can be best served by pursuing meaningful change within our organization, not by decertification.
 USA Gymnastics has commissioned an independent investigation to understand how such abuse, on the scale described so bravely by those who have survived Larry Nassar, could have been allowed to go undetected for so long, and is committed to implementing any necessary or appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC share the same goal: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and accountable environment.
 In the 1960s, Brzezinski was an advisor to John F. Kennedy and later to the Lyndon B. Johnson administration.
 During the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy and then served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As a member of the NSA, he collaborated with Carter in the diplomatic management of international affairs, including the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of relations between China and the United States in the late 1970s, the Iranian revolution (which led to the Iran hostage crisis in 1979) and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, has collected nominations in all the main categories.
 Gosling and the Stone have had the nomination: best actor and best actress respectively.
 Other nominations include best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original score, best production design, best sound editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, were nominated for Best Original Song. The studio with the most nominations was Lionsgate, with 26.
 On Sunday evening, US President Donald Trump issued a statement through his press secretary, announcing the withdrawal of US troops from Syria.
 The announcement came after a phone call between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey, the statement said, would also take over the custody of ISIS prisoners, who, on the refusal of European nations, have not been repatriated.
 This not only confirms that some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory already widely accepted, but provides more details than fossils, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 According to scientists, the plumage of this animal was brownish-gray on top, with a pale or carotenoid coloration on the bottom.
 The discovery also allows to obtain detailed information about the evolution of bird feathers.
 Since the dinosaur's plumage is not equipped with the basic structure, the so-called rachis, but instead has other features typical of feathers, barbs and barbules, the researchers concluded that the rachis is probably the result of an evolutionary development subsequent to these characteristics.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that it was not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation or for courtship. The researchers hypothesize that, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the find shows an adult plumage and not the down of a chick.
 According to the researchers' hypothesis, despite the tail belonging to a young dinosaur, the specimen reveals a plumage from an adult specimen and not that of a chick.
 A car bomb exploded yesterday morning in the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two officers and injuring more than twenty people.
 The governor's office said that among the injured, 19 were police officers.
 Police said the suspect responsible for the attack is a suspected Daesh (ISIL) militant.
 They found that the Sun works on the same basic principles as other stars: the activity of all the stars in the solar system is determined by their luminosity and rotation.
 Brightness is used together with rotation to define a star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is in relation to magnetic reversals.
 During his trip, Iwasaki got into trouble on several occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped from a forced marriage in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard can operate both in the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz band.
 Provided that the base station has dual radios, this will allow it to be backward compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g.
 802.11n speeds are considerably higher than those of previous versions, with a theoretical maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, married with two adult children, did not arouse much interest in Miller, who told the story.
 When asked for a comment, Miller replied: "Mike talks a lot during the hearing... I was preparing myself so I didn't listen to what he was saying."
 "We will strive to cut carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by a significant margin by 2020, compared with the 2005 levels," Hu said.
 He did not set a precise value for the reduction, saying that it will depend on China's economic productivity.
 Hu urged developing countries to "avoid the old path of polluting first and cleaning up later."
 He also added that they should not, however, be forced to assume obligations that transcend their stage of development, as well as their responsibilities and competencies.
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12:00 GMT today.
 He warns: "No one can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this time will stop sectarian warfare, growing violence or a slide into chaos."
 The report begins with a call for open debate and consensus in the United States about Middle East policy.
 The report is highly critical of almost all aspects of the current policy of the Executive towards Iraq and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations calls for the launch of a new diplomatic initiative to be undertaken by the end of this year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile action and to resume diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, current senator and first lady of Argentina, announced her presidential candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) south of Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner chose the Argentinean Theatre to announce her intention to run for president, the same place where in 2005 she had launched her campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The discussion was sparked by controversy over spending on aid and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives, jokingly, have labeled as "Bush's New Deal for New Orleans."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort has focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to recognized Washington insiders.
 Over four million people came to Rome to take part in the funeral.
 The people present were so numerous that it was not possible for everyone to have access to the funeral in St. Peter's Square.
 In various points of Rome were installed large television screens to allow people to attend the ceremony.
 Similar setups were made in many other Italian cities and around the world, especially in Poland, and a large number of people watched the event through them.
 Historians criticize the FBI’s past policies, arguing that it focused on easy cases, such as car theft, in order to increase the agency’s success rate.
 The initiative against obscenities has been financed by Congress since fiscal year 2005, with the specific request to the FBI to assign 10 agents to adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa made the highest score of the innings with 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, played well and scored in collaboration hundred runs.
 Then the captain lost his wicket, and from that moment until the end of the innings India scored only 36 runs, losing 7 wickets.
 On the morning of November 16, US President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore and began his one-week stay in Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong, with whom he discussed trade and terrorism issues.
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush delivered a speech on trade development in Asia.
 After a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton in the PMO on Tuesday, Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to refer the government's Clean Air Act to a committee of all parties in preparation for second reading.
 At the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested some amendments to the Conservative Party's environmental bill, urging a "thorough and complete rewrite".
 Since the federal government has intervened to take over the financing of the Mersey Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and several MPs have criticised the move as a pre-election ploy ahead of the federal election in November.
 Prime Minister John Howard has however declared that the purpose of the gesture, thanks to an extra donation of 45 million Australian dollars, was only to protect the hospital's facilities from the downgrading by the Tasmanian government.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level readings have indicated the generation of a tsunami. Near Pago Pago and Niue, activity consistent with that of a tsunami has been recorded.
 No damage to property or people was reported in Tonga, however, the power outage prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii near the coast were closed for the entire day on Wednesday despite the warnings having been lifted.
 The announcement was welcomed by US President George W. Bush.
 Gordon Johndroe, spokesman for Bush, called the promise of North Korea "a major step towards the achievement of the goal of denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 On today's day the tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, subtropical cyclone Jerry, formed in the Atlantic Ocean.
 According to the National Hurricane Center (NHC), Jerry is no longer a threat to land.
 According to an estimate by the USACE, 6 inches of rain could break through the previously damaged levees.
 The Ninth Ward, where Hurricane Katrina had caused flooding up to 20 feet high, is now almost completely submerged as water has breached the levee nearby.
 Water is spilling over a 100-foot section of the levee.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disapproval of the deletions during his chat with Wikinews last month.
 "Basically [Wales] lied to us from the beginning. First, by acting as if it was for legal reasons. Second, by pretending to listen to us until the moment of the actual deletion of the works by him."
 Following community discomfort, efforts have been made to draft a policy regarding sexual content on the site, which hosts millions of open-licensed multimedia content.
 The activity carried out was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the actual observations of the Sagittarius galaxy.
 The team's goal was to see if the tidal forces between the dark matter in this galaxy and the dark matter in the Milky Way could cause the effect.
 Just as the Moon exerts a gravitational pull on the Earth that generates the tides, the Milky Way also exerts a force on the Sagittarius galaxy.
 Scientists have been able to deduce that the effects of dark matter on other dark matter are the same effects that have the "normal" matter.
 This theory suggests that much of the dark matter around a galaxy is collected in a kind of halo, formed by a multitude of small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are urging people living near the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese Nuclear Agency, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 The authorities' hypothesis is that this indicates a break and a consequent loss of uranium fuel containers at the site.
 Dr Tony Moll has identified extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) in the South African province of KwaZulu-Natal.
 According to a statement released in an interview, this new variant was "highly concerning and alarming, because of the high mortality rate".
 According to Dr. Moll, some patients may have contracted the microbe inside the hospital, and at least two of them were healthcare workers at the hospital itself.
 In the course of a year an infected person can infect from 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Nevertheless, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total group of people affected by tuberculosis still seems low; 6,000 out of a total of 330,000 people infected at a given time in South Africa.
 The collision between the satellites, both weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, occurred 491 miles from Earth.
 Scientists say the collision caused an explosion.
 They are still trying to determine the size of the crash and what consequences it will have on Earth.
 The U.S. Strategic Command of the U.S. Department of Defense is tracking the debris.
 The result of the analysis of the tracks will be published on a public website.
 Ohio authorities say a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after the body of his mother was found in the trunk of her car on Wednesday.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Ohio, in Blue Ash, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground next to the road with a shirt and underwear, apparently under the influence of drugs.
 He directed the officers to his old black Oldsmobile Intrigue that was 500 feet away.
 There, wrapped in blood-stained blankets, was found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53.
 According to the police, the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the seasonal disease occurred at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans by mosquito bites.
 The Indian government, spurred by the epidemic, has taken some measures such as deploying people to catch pigs in the most affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million vaccine doses against encephalitis, to ensure that next year health facilities are not caught unprepared.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to historically hard-hit areas this year have been delayed by a lack of funding and because they have been given a low priority compared to other diseases.
 Three years after his move to Sweden in 1956, Słania began working for the Swedish Post, becoming its chief engraver.
 He has created more than 1,000 stamps, both for Sweden and for 28 other countries.
 The quality and detail of his work is so well recognized that he has become one of the very few "household names" among philatelists, with some specializing in collecting only his work.
 In 2000 it issued its 1000th stamp, the magnificent "Great Deeds by Swedish Kings" by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, which is listed in the Guinness Book of Records.
 His work also included engraving banknotes for many countries. Recent examples of this work include the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new Canadian $5 and $100 banknotes.
 Gibson was taken to hospital after the accident, but died shortly afterwards.
 The truck driver, who is 64 years old, was unharmed in the crash.
 The vehicle involved was removed from the scene of the accident the same day, around 12:00 GMT.
 A person who worked in a garage near the scene of the accident said: "There were children waiting to cross the road, all shouting in tears."
 They all returned from the place where the accident had happened.
 Other topics on the Bali agenda include saving the world's last remaining forests and sharing technologies to support the growth of developing nations in less polluting ways.
 The UN also hopes to create a fund to help countries affected by global warming to cope with its impacts.
 The money could be used to build flood-resistant homes, improve water management and diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to discourage women from speaking openly about women's health have not succeeded.
 She came to this conclusion thanks to the multitude of positive comments and encouragement she received from both men and women pushing for the recognition of contraceptive drugs as a medical necessity.
 At the end of the fighting, after the wounded had been taken to hospital, about 40 of the remaining prisoners remained in the yard, refusing to return to their cells.
 Negotiators have tried to resolve the situation, but the demands of the detainees are unclear.
 Between 10:00 p.m. and 11:00 p.m. MDT inmates set fire to the courtyard.
 Shortly afterwards, riot police entered the courtyard and cornered the inmates using tear gas.
 Firefighters eventually managed to put out the fire at 23:35.
 Following the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal flooding that spread sediment along the river course has stopped.
 This sediment was instrumental in the creation of both beaches and sandbars that became habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have become extinct and two more are at risk of extinction, including the hunchbacked wolf eel.
 Although the flood will only raise the water level by a few meters, the authorities hope that it will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks further downstream.
 No tsunami warning has been issued and according to the Jakarta geophysics agency, no warning will be issued as the quake did not reach the 6.5 magnitude threshold.
 Despite there being no risk of a tsunami, residents began to panic, abandoning businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey has given the farewell in tears, she assured her fans that she will return.
 "This will not be a farewell. Here closes a chapter and opens a new one".
 The final results of the presidential and parliamentary elections in Namibia saw the re-election of the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, who won a significant lead.
 In the parliamentary elections, the ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO), also won the majority of seats.
 The coalition and Afghan troops reached the area to secure the site, then came the support of other coalition aircraft.
 The accident occurred in high mountains and is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 The search efforts for the crash site encounter bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical charity Medecins Sans Frontieres (MSF) and the World Health Organisation (WHO) say this is the worst outbreak in the country.
 A spokesman for Medecins Sans Frontieres, Richard Veerman, said: "Angola is about to experience the worst epidemic ever and the situation in this country remains very serious."
 Today at 10:00 the weather was magnificent when the matches started and, despite a sprinkling of rain in the morning that lasted very little, it was a perfect day for rugby 7.
 South Africa, first seed of the tournament, started with the right foot by winning easily against Zambia (26 - 00), fifth seed.
 Despite looking rather rusty in the match against the southern sisters, South Africa has steadily improved its performance throughout the tournament.
 They distinguished themselves with disciplined defense, ball handling skills and excellent teamwork. It was clear that they were the team to beat.
 The tree, according to officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum, is infested with a fungus and poses a public health hazard because it was in imminent danger of falling.
 It was due to be demolished on Tuesday, but was saved by an emergency court ruling.
 The entrances to the caves, called "The Seven Sisters", all have a diameter of at least 100-250 meters (328-820 feet).
 Infrared images show thermal oscillations between day and night, demonstrating that they are probably caves.
 During the day they are colder than the surrounding surface and at night they are warmer.
 Glen Cushing of the astrogeology team of the USGS and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, Arizona, said: "Their thermal behavior is not as steady as that of large terrestrial caves, which often maintain a relatively stable temperature, but is consistent with the fact that they are deep holes in the ground."
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters enter an isolated booth and put a pre-printed ballot into an envelope indicating their chosen candidate.
 After verifying his identity by the officials, the voter deposits the envelope in the ballot box and signs the electoral register.
 The French electoral law codifies the procedures in a rather rigorous way.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes must be transparent, so that voters and observers can testify that at the beginning of the vote there are no envelopes and that no others are added to those of the voters, duly counted and authorized.
 Candidates may send representatives to attend each stage of the process. In the evening, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision, in accordance with specific procedures.
 ASUS' Eee PC, previously launched worldwide for its low-cost and functionality, has become a controversial topic at the IT Month event in Taipei 2007.
 But the consumer market for notebooks will be significantly changed and different after the award of the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 to ASUS by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The station's website describes the show as "old-fashioned radio drama with a new and irreverent geeky twist!"
 Initially, the show was broadcast only on the historic online radio site TogiNet Radio, specializing in radio talk shows.
 TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a sister station in late 2015.
 The program originally used non-professional voice actors from East Texas.
 Widespread looting would have continued during the night, given the absence of law enforcement officers on the streets of Bishkek.
 According to one witness, Bishkek was sinking into a state of "anarchy", with gangs of people roaming the streets looting shops of consumer goods.
 Various residents of Bishkek have criticized the southern protesters for illegal actions.
 South Africa won against the All Blacks (New Zealand) in the rugby tournament Tri Nations match played at home at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg.
 The final score was a one-point win (21-20), ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks this was the end of a run of five consecutive defeats.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the cup two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the tournament, which will see the Springboks in action against Australia, will take place next week at Ellis Park in Johannesburg.
 A small earthquake struck western Montana on Monday at 10:08 p.m.
 The United States Geological Survey (USGS) and its National Earthquake Information Center have not received any immediate reports of damage.
 The earthquake's epicenter was located about 20 km (15 miles) north-northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 The strain of avian influenza H5N1, lethal to humans, has infected a wild duck, found dead on Monday, in the eastern part of France, in a swamp near Lyon.
 France is the seventh country in the European Union, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, to be hit by the virus.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for "sowing death, destruction and terror among millions and millions of inhabitants of the Earth."
 According to Chambers, an agnostic, his lawsuit is "superficial" and "anyone can be sued by anyone."
 The story presented by Camille Saint-Saens at the French Opera tells of an artist "whose life revolves around the love of drugs and Japan".
 This means that during the show the actors smoke pipes and urge the audience to join them.
 They are, respectively, fourth, fifth and sixth place Newt Gingrich, former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, Governor of Texas and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum but had harsh words for Romney, for whom negative ads against Gingrich were aired in Iowa.
 Perry said, "I will be back in Texas tonight to see the results of tonight's vote and see if there is a path forward for me in this race"; however, he later said he would remain in the race and would participate in the South Carolina primary on January 21.
 Bachmann, who won the straw poll in Iowa in August, has decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was rushed to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 He was about 20 years old. Bieber said, "Although I was not present nor directly involved in this terrible accident, my thoughts and prayers go out to the victim's family."
 According to the entertainment news website TMZ, the photographer stopped his vehicle on the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take a picture of the police officer directing traffic at a stop sign, then crossed the street and continued, forcing the California Highway Patrol officer who was conducting the traffic stop to tell him twice to get back.
 According to the police, it is unlikely that the driver of the car that hit the photographer will face criminal charges.
 With only eighteen medals available each day, a good number of countries failed to make it onto the podium.
 Among these, the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen placed ninth in the women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland with Katja Saarinen placed tenth in the same classification.
 Australian Mitchell Gourley took the 11th place in the men's Super-G, while the Czech opponent Oldrich Jelinek took the 16th place in the same specialty.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez finished in 15th place in the men's sitting Super-G. In the men's standing Super-G, New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth.
 The Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super-G. South Korean Jong Seork Park finished 24th in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are believed to have brought the disease with them, starting it in the soldiers' camp.
 According to the lawsuit, the inadequate sanitation of the United Nations camp has caused the bacterial contamination of the tributary of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's main rivers.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti's problems with the disease dated back to the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited independent studies that the disease was unknowingly introduced to Haiti by Nepalese UN peacekeeping forces.
 Danielle Lantagne, a United Nations expert on the disease, said the outbreak could have been caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient was admitted to Howard University Hospital in stable condition.
 The patient had travelled to Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola virus have been reported.
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including isolating the patient to prevent others from becoming infected.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon had worked on various shows in various roles.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows like Taxi, Cheers and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989 he participated in the creation of "The Simpsons" ("The Simpsons") along with Brooks and Groening and was responsible for the selection of the first team of writers of the show.
 He left the show in 1993, but retained the title of executive producer and continued to collect tens of millions in royalties each season.
 At first, the Chinese news agency Xinhua had reported the hijacking of an aircraft.
 According to reports received later the plane received a bomb threat and was diverted back to Afghanistan, landing in Kandahar.
 Early reports say the plane was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was denied emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, whose fleet is now obsolete and poorly maintained, both in the civilian and military sectors.
 International sanctions meant that they could not buy new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, three people were killed and three others injured in a police helicopter crash.
 Last month Iran experienced the worst air disaster in years: a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 The same month saw another airliner run off the runway in Mashad and crash into a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The subsequent concerts of the tour were canceled by Aerosmith.
 The rock group sarenne had to leave for a tour in the United States and Canada that was to last until September 16.
 It cancelled the tour after lead vocalist Steven Tyler injured himself following a fall from the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after the players had held their serve in each set.
 Del Potro had an early lead in the second set, which also ended in a tie-break after the score of 6-6.
 At this point, Del Potro was treated for his shoulder but was able to return to play.
 The start of the program was at 20:30 local time (15:00 UTC).
 Some famous singers from all over the country offered bhajans, devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh, accompanied by singer Raju Khandelwal, also presented the bhajan chhappan bhog.
 Then, Lakkha Singh took the initiative and started singing bhajans.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (for Hindu religion, 56 edible products including sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc. offered to the deity) were served to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also presented the bhajan for the chhappan bhog. He was accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 At the presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintendo, revealed the design of the controller of the new Nintendo Revolution console.
 In a similar way to the TV remote control, two sensors placed next to the user's TV can triangulate their position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements within the game by moving the device in the air.
 Shortly after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and ended his race.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, was in the lead for most of the race, but his race ended immediately after his pit stop, probably due to the incorrect mounting of the right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher reached the finish line behind Alonso, due to a suspension damage that occurred during one of the duels in which he was involved during the race.
 According to a transcript of the press conference, he said: "She's very pretty and she sings quite well."
 Every time we rehearsed, I felt moved to tears.
 After about 3 minutes after launch, a camera on board saw various pieces of insulating foam coming off the fuel tank.
 It is not believed, however, that they caused damage to the shuttle.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr., NASA's Space Shuttle Program Manager, said the foam fell after the time that concerned them.
 Five minutes after the beginning of the show, the wind starts, about a minute later, the wind is reaching 70 km/h... then comes the rain, so violent and torrential to sting your skin like a needle, then hail starts to fall, people in panic, screaming and running, overwhelming.
 "I lost my sister and her friend, while I was moving I had in front of me two disabled people in wheelchairs and people jumping on them and pushing them," said Armand Versace.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant, which is located in Niigata Prefecture, was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no damage from the quake, and said that reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 According to reports, about 9,400 homes in the area are without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, the railway network has been interrupted in the affected areas and the airport of Noto, in the province of Ishikawa, remains closed.
 A bomb has exploded outside the office of the governor general.
 Within two hours, three more bombs exploded near government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight and official reports confirm that there have been up to 30 injured, although the final figures are not yet known.
 In the home urine samples of deceased people who had eaten contaminated pet food, traces of both cyanide and melamine were found.
 The researchers at the university have stated that the two compounds react with each other forming crystals that can hinder kidney function.
 Researchers have detected in the urine of cats the formation of crystals, due to the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 By comparison using infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR), the composition of these crystals corresponds to that found in the urine of pets that are affected.
 I don't know if you realize it or not, but a large part of the goods coming from Central America entered our country duty-free.
 Nevertheless, 80% of our goods have been taxed with duties in the Central American countries.
 It all seemed to me to be nonsense; it certainly was not right.
 All I say to people is treat us like we treat you.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill into law that bans the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill would require violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a "18" rating and would make it a misdemeanor to sell them to minors.
 This morning the chief prosecutor, Kier Starmer QC, released a statement saying that both Huhne and Pryce will be charged.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in government by Ed Davey MP. It is expected that Norman Lamb MP will take over the role of Minister for Business left vacant by Davey.
 The appearance of Huhne and Pryce at the Westminster Magistrates' Court is scheduled for February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and the driver, Zachary Cuddeback, 21.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider will undergo surgery to reconstruct his face.
 Uka's gun did not explode when it was pointed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has constant pain, is blind in one eye, has a section of his skull missing and his face has been rebuilt in titanium.
 Schneider testified via videoconference from a USAF base in his country.
 In addition to the Wednesday event, Carpanedo participated in two individual races of the Championships.
 The first in slalom, where at the first descent he recorded a DNF. Another 36 competitors out of 116 in the same race did not finish the race.
 The other race in which she participated, the giant slalom, she was ranked tenth in the women's group of the "seated" category, with a combined time of 4:41.30, slower than 2:11.60 minutes compared to the first-placed Austrian Claudia Loesch, and slower than 1:09.02 minutes compared to the ninth place of the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani.
 Four female skiers in the women's group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 participants in the Giant Slalom did not qualify for the race.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh managed to recover the laptop and the cell phone that had been stolen.
 Deputy Inspector General DK Arya said: "Five people have been arrested for raping the Swiss woman. We have also recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 The names of the accused are: Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 According to the superintendent of police Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared in court with their faces covered.
 None of the three people who were in the house at the time of the car crash was injured.
 Nevertheless, the driver was seriously injured in the head.
 The road on which the accident occurred was temporarily closed, while the rescue services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya is at the court of the sheriff of Edinburgh with the charge of having killed his own son.
 She is being held in custody pending trial and sentencing, but any testimony given by an eyewitness could be tainted, as her image has been widely publicized.
 This is common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scottish justice has other parameters. The Scottish courts have found the publication of the photos potentially prejudicial.
 According to Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee, "journalists who publish photos or other information about suspects are walking on a minefield".
 The Crown Office, which has overall responsibility for prosecutions, told reporters it would not be making any further comment until the formal charge was made.
 The document is expected to address the dispute over borders, which Palestinians want to be based on the pre-1967 lines.
 Other issues reportedly discussed include the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Once the agreement is signed, Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley, while the Palestinian Authority agrees to abandon such presence only for five years.
 The shooters in the experimental program for the control of pests had to be carefully supervised by the rangers, since the experiment was monitored and its effectiveness evaluated.
 As part of the Sporting Shooters Association hunting program, the NPWS in collaboration with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc., has recruited qualified volunteers.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of Park Conservation and Heritage of the NPWS, the four shooters chosen for the first shooting operation have received comprehensive training and safety instructions.
 Yesterday Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) composed of nine members.
 This is Martelly's fifth provisional electoral council in four years.
 Last month a presidential commission proposed a package of measures aimed at pushing the country towards new elections, including the resignation of the previous CEP.
 The commission was Martelly's response to widespread protests, which began in October, that challenged the regime.
 Occasionally violent protests have been sparked by the failure to hold elections, some of which were scheduled as early as 2011.
 About 60 cases of overheating malfunctioning iPod have been reported, which caused a total of six fires and caused minor burns to four people.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 incidents involving the devices.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that it had been informed by Apple of another 34 incidents related to overheating, which the company described as "non-serious".
 In its response, the ministry called Apple's delay of the report "absolutely deplorable."
 The earthquake in the Marianas was felt at 07:19 local time (21:19 GMT on Friday).
 According to the Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Office, no damage was reported in the nation.
 And also the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center reported that there were no signs of a tsunami in progress.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former Filipino policeman took hostage tourists from Hong Kong after hijacking their bus.
 With his M16 rifle, Rolando Mendoza fired at the tourists.
 Many of the hostages have been rescued, at least six have died.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were freed immediately along with the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then replaced an elderly lady who needed to use the bathroom. Mendoza was struck dead.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and became a doctor.
 After training as an obstetrician, she joined the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While working at the hospital, Liggins began to study cases of premature labor in his spare time.
 His research showed that the administration of a hormone would accelerate the maturation of the lungs in the fetus.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators Wednesday recovered two "black boxes" with flight recordings.
 Even his fellow wrestlers wanted to pay tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said: "Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme. My first manager. She died on the night of the two moons. Alone, just like her. A strong woman."
 "Luna was as weird as me… Maybe even more… I love her and I'm going to miss her… Hopefully she's in a better place," was the comment of Dustin "Goldust" Runnels.
 According to a poll of 1,400 people before the 2010 federal election, those opposed to Australia becoming a republic increased by 8% since 2008.
 During the 2010 federal election campaign, the then-acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, stated that she believed Australia should become a republic at the end of Elizabeth II's reign.
 This opinion is shared by 34% of respondents, according to whom Queen Elizabeth II should be the last monarch of Australia.
 At the opposite end of the survey, 29% of respondents say Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, while 31% say it should never become one.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but has suffered a number of injuries which have led to doubts over her fitness.
 He could not take the necessary medication to overcome the pain because they are banned from the Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at Central Missouri University, discovered the largest prime number ever known to date.
 The discovery was verified by several people through the use of various hardware and software in early February, and was announced Tuesday.
 Comets could have been one of the sources that led to the Earth water and organic matter, that is, the material capable of forming proteins and support life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form and in particular how the Earth formed, having collided with comets a long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, has been governor since the beginning of this year; last month he signed a law legalizing same-sex marriage.
 According to him, speculation is nothing but "political chatter and nonsense".
 He is considering a run for the presidency in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen would allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel a year, reducing carbon dioxide emissions.
 The system uses satellite technology instead of the outdated ground-based radar, to allow air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more precisely and provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transport is being laid on and surface trains will not stop at Wembley, while there is no car parking or interchange facilities on site.
 Fears about the lack of transportation have emerged the possibility of making the game obligatorily played behind closed doors, without the support of the fans of the team.
 According to a study published Thursday in the journal Science, a new species of bird has emerged on the Galapagos Islands in Ecuador.
 According to researchers from Princeton University, United States, and Uppsala University, Sweden, the new species evolved in just two generations, although it was believed that the time required for this process was much longer; this is due to the mating between a Darwin endemic finch, Geospiza fortes, and the immigrant cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be worked into any shape. It can be rolled into tiny shapes.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, suitable for being twisted and woven. It can be hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin and attached to other metals. Sometimes it was used to decorate the hand-painted images in books called "illuminated manuscripts" precisely because of its ability to be made so thin.
 This is the so-called pH of the substance. Using the juice of red cabbage it is possible to build a pH indicator.
 The juice of the cabbage changes color depending on how acidic or basic (alkaline) the chemical element is.
 The pH level of the chemical analyzed is given by the amount of hydrogen ions present (the letter H of pH).
 Hydrogen ions are protons from which electrons have been stripped (since hydrogen atoms are made up of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two dried powders together and then, with clean and wet hands, stuff them into a ball.
 Between the moisture on your hands and the outer layers, a reaction will occur that will cause a strange sensation and form a kind of shell.
 Almost all the houses in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had a bathroom with running water connected to an advanced sewage system.
 In Greece, in the houses of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini have been discovered remains of sewer networks.
 Toilets in antiquity also existed in Egypt, Persia and China. In Roman civilization they were sometimes inserted in public baths, frequented by a mixed public of men and women.
 To call someone far away thousands of miles, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the signal and then sends it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket. Scientists use space telescopes because the Earth's atmosphere distorts light and vision.
 To transport a satellite or telescope into space requires a rocket more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world enormously. Among the various advantages it has offered us, the most important is that it has provided us with simpler and faster transport.
 Thanks to his invention, the train, the automobile and several other means of transportation came into being.
 Below them are other medium-sized felines that feed on medium-sized prey, ranging from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small felines (including domestic cats in the wild) that feed on small prey, considerably more numerous, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 The concept of niche is the secret of their success, a particular goal that each feline has and that allows them not to compete with others.
 Lions are the most social of the felines and live in large groups called prides.
 The herds are composed of adult males, usually 2 or 3 related, and a number of females and cubs that can reach 30.
 Usually the females are closely related to each other, being a large family of daughters and sisters.
 The lion pride acts in a very similar way to the wolf or dog pack, whose behaviour is in fact surprisingly similar to that of lions (but not to that of other big cats), even as regards the deadly attacks on their prey.
 A complete athlete: the tiger is able to climb (although not very well), swim, make very long jumps and exert a pulling force five times greater than that of a strong man.
 The tiger belongs to the same family (the genus Panthera) as the lion, the leopard and the jaguar. These four felines are the only ones to roar.
 The roar of the tiger is not as powerful as that of the lion, but it sounds more like a sentence of shouted and angry words.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals. If possible, they go hunting for monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds and almost all the prey they catch are much smaller than them.
 Scientists believe that the ocelots follow and find animals to eat (prey) thanks to their sense of smell, sniffing the ground where they have been.
 Thanks to their night vision, they can see very well in the dark, and they can move stealthily. To hunt their prey, they camouflage themselves with the surrounding environment and then pounce on them.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) separates from the main population to which it belongs (for example, if it moves across a mountain range or a river, or moves to a new island, making it difficult to return), it will probably find itself in a different environment than the one it was in before.
 This new environment is characterized by different resources and competitors, so, to position itself as a strong competitor, the new population will need different characteristics or transformations than those needed previously.
 The original population has not changed at all; it still needs the same adaptations as before.
 As time goes by and the new population adapts to its new environment, it looks less and less like the other population.
 At some point, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will appear so different from each other that they can no longer be defined as belonging to the same species.
 This process, which involves the formation of new species, is called speciation. Speciation is an inevitable consequence of evolution and is a fundamental element of evolution.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide exhaled by humans (through exhalation).
 Plants make their own food with the sun through photosynthesis. They also provide shade.
 We build our houses from plants and make our clothes from plants. Most of the food we eat comes from plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The mosasaur was the superpredator of its era and for this reason it feared nothing, except other mosasaurs.
 From its long jaws protruded more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an additional row on the palate, so that for anyone who crossed its path there was no escape.
 We don't know for sure, but it's possible that it had a forked tongue. Its diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and it may have been a cannibal.
 He would attack anything that entered the water; not even a giant dinosaur like the T-Rex could compete with him.
 Although most of their food would be familiar to us, Roman banquets also included some strange or unusual dishes, such as wild boar, peacock, snails and a rodent called a gopher.
 Another difference was that while the poor and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich men liked to feast together lying on their sides while consuming their meal.
 Of course, the food of the ancient Romans did not include many foods that arrived in Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they had no maize, tomatoes, potatoes or cocoa, and none of the ancient Romans had ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians built a main temple for each god, which was considered the god's home.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods and priests tried to provide for the needs of the deities through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and then an inner sanctuary accessible only to priests.
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built as part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a sanctuary dedicated to the god.
 Thanks to the mild climate that characterizes the Middle East, the house was not of fundamental importance.
 Much of the life of the Jewish family took place outdoors.
 Women cooked in the courtyard, while shops were simple open-air stalls that faced the street. Stone was used to build houses.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. In the Norse sagas it is said that Erik the Red gave it its name, having encountered Greenland on his voyage after being exiled from Iceland for murder.
 But, regardless of its discovery, at that time the Eskimo tribes already lived there.
 Although all of them are "Scandinavian" countries, the people, kings, customs and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland were very different.
 If you've seen the movie "The Da Vinci Code", you might think that the back of the Declaration of Independence is a treasure map.
 However, this is false. Even though something is written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence is the inscription "Original Declaration of Independence July 4, 1776." The text appears upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although it is not known for sure who wrote it, it is known that at the beginning of its existence the large parchment document (measuring 29.75 inches by 24.5 inches) was rolled up to be stored.
 Probably, therefore, the annotation was only added as a label.
 The D-Day landings and the ensuing fighting had brought the north of France to liberation, but the south was still occupied.
 It was ruled by the Vichy regime, that is, by those Frenchmen who in 1940 had made peace with the Germans and allied themselves with the invaders, instead of fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France: this offensive operation was called "Operation Dragoon".
 American and Free French forces had liberated southern France in just two weeks and were heading for Germany.
 By civilization we mean a specific culture, shared by a significantly large group of people who live and work in a cooperative manner, forming a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin "civilis", which means civil; the term is in turn linked with "civis", that is citizen, and "civitas", that is city or city-state, and in a certain way defines also the dimensions of society.
 The city-states are the first realities to anticipate the idea of nation. Culture of civility means to transmit knowledge through several generations, to leave an indelible cultural imprint through a fair diffusion.
 Minor cultures often disappear without leaving any significant historical traces, and are not recognized as true civilizations.
 During the War of Independence, the thirteen states formed a weak central government for the first time, and the Congress was its only member, according to the Articles of Confederation.
 The Congress had no power to impose taxes and, given the absence of a national executive or judicial power, relied on state authorities, often uncooperative, to enforce its acts.
 He did not even have the authority to bypass tax laws and tariffs between states.
 To amend the articles required the unanimous consent of all the states, which in turn had so little regard for the central government that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, along with the German national football team, the second most successful national football team in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the most popular sports are: football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula 1 car racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern regions and see Italians competing in international competitions and Olympic events.
 The Japanese archipelago is made up of almost 7,000 islands (the largest is Honshu), making Japan the seventh largest archipelago in the world!
 From a geographical point of view, Japan is referred to as an "archipelago", considering the presence of groups of islands that make it up.
 Taiwan was born in the 15th century, when European sailors who passed by soon recorded the name of the island with the name of Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 The Dutch East India Company in 1624 establishes a base in the southwest of Taiwan, beginning a transformation that affected the production systems of the aborigines and hiring Chinese laborers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan came under the control of the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912); in 1885, Taiwan was declared a province of the Qing Empire.
 After being defeated in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki in 1895, ceding sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan; the island remained under Japanese rule until 1945.
 Machu Picchu comprises three primary structures, namely the Intihuatana, The Temple of the Sun and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Much of the peripheral buildings have been rebuilt to give tourists a more accurate idea of their original appearance.
 In 1976, 30% of the Machu Picchu site had been recovered, but restoration work is still ongoing.
 The most common format in the world for still photography, for example, is 35 mm, the same as the film most used at the end of the analogue photography era.
 It is still produced today and, more importantly, its aspect ratio is inherited from the image sensor sizes of digital cameras.
 Strangely, the height of the 35 mm format is 24 mm and its width is 36 mm.
 The proportions of this format (dividing by twelve to get the simplest ratio of whole numbers) are therefore considered 3:2.
 The proportions of many of the formed common (for example the family of formats APS) are equal or very close to this value.
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline that creates dynamism while maintaining a measure of order within an image.
 According to this rule, the most effective place to position the main subject is at the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds, both vertically and horizontally (as in the example).
 At this stage in European history, the Catholic Church, having become rich and powerful, found itself under scrutiny.
 Christianity had acted as a glue between European states for over a thousand years, despite linguistic and cultural differences.
 His omnipresent power influenced everyone, from the king to ordinary citizens.
 One of the foundations of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty and that the church's monetary reserves exist for this very reason.
 The central authority of the church has remained in Rome for over a thousand years, and this convergence of power and money has led many to question whether this principle has been respected.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain decided to implement a naval blockade against Germany.
 The strategy proved effective: it involved the interruption of any essential military and civilian supply, despite this blockade violating international law as usually accepted and codified by multiple international treaties of the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent access to entire sections of the ocean, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 As this tactic had elicited a limited response, Germany expected a similar reaction to its indiscriminate U-boat warfare campaign.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and nations were pacifism and isolation.
 After witnessing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, nations wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla accepted a job offer from the Edison Company in New York City, and this led him to move to the United States of America.
 He arrived in the United States with 4 cents in his pocket, a book of poems and a letter of recommendation written by Charles Batchelor (his boss in his previous job) and addressed to Thomas Edison.
 In ancient China, the different periods of time were indicated in a very singular way: each period of China or each family that was in power constituted a specific dynasty.
 Even the intervals between the individual dynasties were characterized by periods of instability and division between the provinces. The most famous was the so-called period of the Three Kingdoms, between the Han dynasty and the Jin dynasty, which lasted for 60 years.
 In these periods, between many nobles fighting for the throne, fierce wars broke out.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the most violent in ancient China's history, with thousands of people dying in the struggle to gain a place of honour in the imposing palace of Xi'an.
 The social and political effects are numerous, among these we can mention the use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to the republic, nationalism and the conviction that the nation belongs to the people and is not the property of a single sovereign.
 In addition, after the Revolution, professions were open to all male candidates, allowing the most ambitious and fortunate to succeed.
 The same goes for the military, since the army rankings, instead of being based on class, are now based on caliber.
 The French Revolution was a source of inspiration for many other oppressed workers in various countries to start their own revolution.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in matters beyond this life. He used to go to a cave known as "Hira" on the mountain of "noor" (light) to meditate.
 The cave, which has survived the passage of time, offers in itself a very clear image of the spirituality of Muhammad.
 The cave is located on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, completely detached from the rest of the world.
 It is not easy to find, even if you know it exists, and once inside the cave, the isolation is total.
 There is nothing but a beautiful clear sky and a lot of mountains around. From inside the cave you can see or hear very little of the outside world.
 Among the seven wonders of the world, the Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one that has survived to the present day.
 Built by the Egyptians in the third century BC, the Great Pyramid is one of the great pyramidal structures built in honor of the dead pharaoh.
 The Giza Plateau, or "Giza Necropolis", in the Valley of the Kings in Egypt, is home to numerous pyramids (the largest of which is the Pyramid of Cheops), several smaller tombs, various temples and the Great Sphinx.
 The important pyramid was created in honor of Pharaoh Cheops, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs and temples were built to honor the wives and family members of the pharaoh.
 The "up arc" looks like a V and the "down arc" looks like a staple or a square with the bottom cut off.
 Up means that you should start from the tip and push the bow, and down means that you should start from the alamaro (which is where the hand holds the bow) and pull the bow towards yourself.
 An ascending bow usually generates a softer sound, while with a descending bow a stronger and more decisive sound is produced.
 You can decide to add your personalized indications with a pencil, but keep in mind that the archeggio signs you find printed have a musical value, so in general they should be respected.
 On 6 October 1789, a crowd of women from the market forced King Louis XVI, in a state of terror, to leave Versailles and return to Paris, along with his wife Marie Antoinette, their two young children (Maria Theresa, 11 years old, and Louis Charles, 4 years old) and his sister-in-law, Elisabeth.
 They returned to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a crowd of people shouting and screaming threats against the sovereigns.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to keep their carriage windows open.
 At one point someone in the crowd showed the terrified queen the head of a royal guard who had been killed at Versailles.
 The war expenses of US imperialism to conquer the Philippines were paid by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the US colonial regime to cover most of the expenses and the interest on the bonds fluctuated in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banks.
 Clearly the enormous profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people were the profits at the base of US imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we must know the context that led to the creation of this order.
 The era in which these events took place is commonly called the High Middle Ages, the period of European history that covers the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (from 1000 to 1300 AD).
 The High Middle Ages was preceded by the Early Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages, which ends conventionally around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that includes in practice a wide range of ideas, from technological innovation or technological imperative to the narrow sense according to which the fate of man is moved by an underlying logic, associated with scientific laws and their realization in technology.
 Much of the interpretation of technological determinism has in common two general ideas: one is that the development of technology itself follows a path that goes far beyond political and cultural influence, and the other is that technology has in turn "effects" on societies that are intrinsic, rather than socially conditioned.
 For example, we can say that the automobile necessarily involves the development of the road network.
 However, a national road network for only a few cars is not economically sustainable, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the costs associated with owning a car.
 The mass possession of cars also leads to a higher percentage of accidents on the roads, and consequently the invention of new techniques of first aid for the care of injured people.
 Romanticism was characterized by a strong component of cultural determinism, drawn from authors such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, geography has conditioned individuals, and over time, customs, habits and culture related to this geography have arisen that, being in harmony with the context of society, have proven to be more effective than laws imposed arbitrarily.
 Like Paris, nowadays known as the capital of fashion in the contemporary world, Constantinople was the capital of fashion in feudal Europe.
 Its reputation as a center of luxury began around 400 AD and continued until about 1100 AD.
 During the twelfth century its prestige declined, especially because the Crusaders returned bringing gifts such as silk and spices, which were valued more than what the Byzantine markets offered.
 It was at this point that the title of fashion capital passed from Constantinople to Paris.
 The highest point of the Gothic style was reached in the period between the 10th and 11th centuries and in the 14th century.
 Initially, clothing was strongly influenced by the Byzantine culture of the east.
 But the slowness of the communication routes means that the diffusion of styles in the West can be delayed by 25-30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most significant developments of the time, as a result of the Crusades, was the introduction of buttons for fastening clothes.
 Subsistence agriculture is defined as agriculture practiced for the sole purpose of producing enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple system, usually organic, using seeds saved from the region and using crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize harvests.
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence farming, and in many developing countries it still is.
 Subcultures unite individuals with the same opinions, who do not feel represented by the standards of society, allowing them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures are distinguished by age, ethnicity, social class, position and/or gender of its members.
 The characteristics that define a subculture can be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic or a combination of factors.
 Often members of a subculture indicate their membership through a peculiar and symbolic use of style, which includes fashions, manners and slang.
 One of the most commonly used methods to explain the importance of socialization is to analyze some unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune, or the effect of intentional abuse, have grown up without proper socialization with adults.
 These children are called "feral" or wild. Some of them have been segregated by people (often their own parents): in some cases the abandonment is motivated by the refusal of a serious intellectual or physical disability by the parents.
 Feral children may have suffered severe violence or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Other children may have been raised by animals; still others seem to have lived alone in the wild.
 When a feral child is totally raised by non-human animals, it shows behaviors (within physical limits) almost entirely analogous to those of the particular animal that took care of him, such as fear or indifference towards man.
 Project-based learning should make learning itself easier and more interesting, while scaffolding goes a bit further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning mode, but rather a help for those who undertake a new learning experience, such as the use of a new computer program or the start of a new project.
 Scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is an example of "scaffolding", but so is the little Office Assistant in the shape of a paperclip.
 The virtual scaffolds are integrated into the software and have the purpose of questioning, soliciting and explaining the procedures that the student may have had difficulty managing on his own.
 Children are given in foster care for various reasons ranging from abandonment to abuse, if not even extortion.
 A child should never grow up in an environment that does not guarantee nutrition, care and education, but they do.
 We believe that foster care is a safe place for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe homes, loving foster parents, stable education, and reliable health care.
 It is assumed that fostering will meet all the needs not met in the home from which they were taken.
 The Internet combines elements of both mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The characteristic elements of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of the theory of uses and gratifications.
 For example, important motivations for Internet use are suggested to be "learning" and "socializing" (James et al., 1995).
 Eighmey and McCord's (1998) study of audience reactions to websites identified two new aspects of motivation, namely "personal involvement" and "continuous relationships".
 The use of video recording has allowed to reach significant discoveries in the interpretation of micro-expressions, which are facial movements lasting a few milliseconds.
 Specifically, it is argued that it is possible to find out if a person is lying by interpreting micro-expressions correctly.
 In his essay "The President's Speech", Oliver Sacks has illustrated how people unable to understand spoken language due to brain damage are nevertheless able to assess with precision the sincerity.
 He even argues that such abilities in interpreting human behavior can be shared with animals, such as domestic dogs.
 In the 20th century, research has shown the existence of two pools of genetic variability, namely hidden variability and expressed variability.
 With mutation a new genetic variability is added, with selection it is eliminated from the pool of expressed variability.
 Generation after generation, segregation and recombination redistribute the variability back and forth between the two pools.
 For a primate with a digestive system similar to that of humans, it is difficult to meet their amino acid requirements with the plant resources available in the savannah.
 In addition, the failure to carry out such activities has serious consequences: slowing growth, malnutrition and, in the end, even death.
 The most easily accessible plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes, but for primates like us they are difficult to digest, unless they are cooked.
 Animal foods (such as ants, termites, and eggs) are not only easy to digest, but they provide a high amount of protein, containing all the essential amino acids.
 In light of all this, it should come as no surprise that our own ancestors solved their “protein problem” in much the same way as savanna chimpanzees do today.
 Sleep interruption is the intentional process of waking during the normal sleep period, followed by a return to sleep (10–60 minutes later).
 This process can be easily practiced using a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you to a state of consciousness, without fully waking you up.
 If you decide to reset the clock in the sleep, you can put it on the other side of the room, so you will be forced to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other options focused on the biorhythm include the consumption of many liquids before bed (especially water or tea, known for its diuretic properties), which forces you to get up to urinate.
 A person enjoys inner peace in proportion to the tension existing in his body and spirit.
 The less tension, the more positive the vital force existing. Each of us has the potential ability to find absolute peace and fulfillment.
 Everyone can reach enlightenment. This goal is only hindered by our tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been enriched by the path of love of the Mahayana ritual and various techniques of Indian yoga.
 In general, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It is based on Kundalini Yoga, meditation and a path of all-embracing love.
 Kundalini Yoga activates the Kundalini energy (energy of enlightenment) through the use of yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 Deity Yoga is the core of Tibetan meditation. Through the visualization of various deities, the energy channels are cleansed, the chakras are activated and the consciousness of enlightenment is developed.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, leading to the cooperation between the USSR and the United States. With the end of the war, systemic, procedural and cultural conflicts led to the break between the two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, former allies had become enemies; the Cold War had begun.
 It would have lasted for the next 40 years and would have been fought for real, by mercenary armies, on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba and many other countries.
 On 17 September 1939, the Polish defence had already been broken; the only option was to retreat and reorganise along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans proved to be obsolete, however, when more than 800,000 Soviet Red Army soldiers advanced and created the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts, after invading the eastern regions of Poland, violating the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other international, bilateral and multilateral treaties.
 Using ships to transport goods is certainly the most efficient way to move large volumes of people and goods across the oceans.
 The task of the Navy has always been to guarantee the country the safeguard of its ability to move people and goods, while at the same time countering the ability of enemies to move their people and goods.
 One of the recent examples in support of this theory and most worthy of note is the Battle of the Atlantic during World War II. During the battle, the Americans were trying to move men and goods across the Atlantic Ocean to support Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using mainly submarines, tried to disrupt this traffic.
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany would probably have been able to conquer Britain, as it had done in the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 They were bred by cultures and tribes of antiquity to have milk, wool, meat and skin readily available.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that were allowed to roam the hills or other grazing areas, often tended by herdsmen (similar to shepherds) who were often children or teenagers. These methods of pastoralism are still used today.
 Already in the 16th century in England wagonways were built.
 Although they were simply made of parallel wooden planks, the wagonways, compared to the slightly more bumpy roads of the period, allowed the horses that ran on them to reach higher speeds and to move heavier loads.
 The sleepers were introduced relatively early to keep the rails in place. Gradually, however, it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they had a top iron bar.
 It became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear of the wooden wheels of the carriages.
 Finally, wooden wheels gave way to iron ones. In 1767, the first completely iron rails appeared.
 The first means of transport that man has known are the legs. Humans began to walk upright two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus (which means "upright man").
 His predecessor, the australopithecine, did not habitually walk upright.
 Signs of bipedalism are present in Australopithecus fossils dating to 4.2–3.9 million years ago, although it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked upright as early as 7 million years ago.
 To try to mitigate in some way the future sufferings we can start to adopt lifestyles more respectful of the environment, we can join the environmental movement and also do activism.
 In many cases this only works as a symptomatic treatment. If we want a permanent solution, we should find the root cause of the problem and disable it.
 It is quite obvious that the world has changed a lot due to the scientific and technological progress of humanity, while the problems have increased due to overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of human beings.
 After Congress adopted it on July 4, a handwritten draft signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson was then sent to the printing shop of John Dunlap a few blocks away.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were produced that night, now known as the "Dunlap Broadside".
 The document was first read publicly on July 8 in the Independence Hall courtyard and the task was entrusted to John Nixon.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he read to his troops in New York on July 9, while a copy reached London on August 10.
 Dunlap's 25 known broadsides are the oldest surviving copies of the document. The original manuscript is lost.
 According to many paleontologists today, one category of dinosaurs survived and is still alive. They are the ones we call birds.
 Many tend to not consider them dinosaurs because of the feathers and their ability to fly.
 Yet birds have many characteristics that unite them with dinosaurs.
 Like the T-Rex, they have feet with scales and claws, lay eggs and walk on their hind legs.
 In the end, the manipulation of information encoded in the form of binary numbers is the basis of all computers currently used.
 A binary number can only have one of two values, either 0 or 1, and in computer science these numbers are called binary digits or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not be immediately apparent. Its symptoms, including vomiting, are very general, making it impossible to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The main indication of internal poisoning could be the presence in the house of an open container of medicines or harmful chemicals.
 Check the label for first aid instructions for that specific poison.
 The term mite is used formally by entomologists for this group of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity in ancient times with bed bugs, insects that have strongly adapted to become parasites of man.
 Both bed bugs and assassin bugs are nesting, meaning they are adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 In the United States of America, multiple sclerosis (MS) affects about 400,000 people, making it the most common neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 The research has shown that the chances of developing MS in females are double those in males.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interest, or in the best interest of their child.
 These couples have the option of choosing an adoption plan for their child.
 In an adoption, the natural parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The primary goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method. This method guides most scientific inquiry.
 But it is not only experimentation, since an experiment is a test that is used to exclude one or more of the possible hypotheses; asking questions and making observations also allows to guide scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on classical texts, especially the Latin version of the Bible.
 Aristotle's views on the various subjects of knowledge, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the progressive decline of the Greek language, the West was isolated from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many have observed that physiological rhythms and behavior are determined by the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms have been documented, which are not just reactions to periodic external signals, in most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are independent oscillators, whose free cycle continues for a period of time even in the absence of external stimuli.
 One of the first experiments to suggest that DNA was a genetic material was the one conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They performed two experiments highlighting the DNA of the bacteriophage with radioactive phosphorus or the protein of the bacteriophage with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a number of different effects depending on the type of mutation, the significance of the piece of genetic material involved and whether the cells affected are in the germ line.
 Mutations that can be passed on to children are only those in the germ cells; mutations elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature tourism attracts people interested in visiting natural areas for the purpose of enjoying the scenery, including flora and fauna.
 Examples of activities to do on the spot include hunting, fishing, photography, birdwatching, park visits and ecosystem information studies.
 For example by visiting, photographing and learning about the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small country towns to drive to work, crossing other people whose workplace is the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic back and forth, everyone is somehow connected to a system of transport based on private cars, which at the same time support.
 Today science reveals that this massive carbon-based economy has forced the biosphere outside of one of its stability conditions that has allowed human evolution for the last two million years.
 Every person participates in social life and uses transport systems, which almost everyone complains about.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear complaints about water quality or crumbling bridges.
 Why do transport systems attract so many complaints, why are they failing every day? Are the engineers who design them incompetent, or are there deeper motivations?
 Traffic Flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles from one point to another and the interactions they generate with each other.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flow is complex because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with absolute certainty.
 Fortunately, driver behavior tends to fall into a reasonably constant range, so traffic flows tend to show a reasonable constancy and can be represented mathematically in a generic way.
 To obtain a more accurate representation of the traffic flow, the three main variables were correlated: (1) flow, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships are useful for planning, designing and managing road structures.
 Insects were the first animals to fly. The ability to fly allowed them to escape enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects are benefited by the ability to fold their wings along their bodies.
 This allows them to exploit a greater variety of small crevices to hide from predators.
 Of all the insects that exist today, the only ones that are not able to fold their wings are dragonflies and damselflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system revolved around the Sun.
 Some people were right, but many others believed the opposite, that the solar system, including the Sun itself (and the other stars), moved around the Earth.
 Which seems sensible, because we don't feel the Earth moving, do we?
 The Amazon River is the largest and second longest river in the world. It carries 8 times the amount of water that the second largest river carries.
 The Amazon River is also the widest river on Earth, with a width that in some places reaches six miles.
 20% of the water that flows from the rivers of the planet into the oceans comes from the Amazon River.
 The main Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 miles) long. It is fed by thousands of smaller tributaries.
 Stone pyramids continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, but despite this, the Giza pyramids were never surpassed in terms of size and technical excellence of their construction.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were awed by the monuments of their ancestors, which were by then more than a thousand years old.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 inhabitants, making it the smallest independent state in the world and the one with the smallest population.
 The official language of the Vatican City for legislation and official communications is Italian.
 Italian is also the everyday language spoken by most people working within the state, while Latin is often used in religious functions.
 In the Vatican City all citizens are Roman Catholics.
 Man has been aware of the basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper since ancient times: these elements can be found in nature in their native form and can be extracted quite easily with the help of primitive tools.
 According to the philosopher Aristotle, everything is made up of a combination of one or more of the following four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 These in fact resemble more the four states of matter, namely (in the same order): solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma. However, he also theorized that they would transform into new substances, forming what we see.
 Alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals. Keep in mind that the periodic table contains many elements.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals. Of course, there are also metals like silver and gold.
 There may also be alloys composed of small amounts of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 In the universe, everything is made of matter and all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are incredibly tiny, so many trillions of them could fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 After its invention, the pencil has proved to be a good friend to many.
 Unfortunately, with the introduction of new writing methods, the pencil has been relegated to a lower status and less widespread use.
 Today everyone writes messages on computer screens and never have to approach a temperamatite.
 We can only wonder what fate will befall the keyboard when something newer comes along.
 The principle that energy is required to bring together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons is the basis of the operation of the fission bomb.
 In practice, it's like rolling a heavy cart up a hill. Then, by further dividing the nucleus, some of that energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to break up in the presence of a small or no push.
 The surface of the Moon is made of rocks and dust and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust has a thickness of about 70 km on the nearest side and 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the seas and thicker under the mountainous areas.
 The maria may be more numerous on the near side because the crust is thinner, which has facilitated the upward movement of the lava to the surface.
 Content theories focus on finding what satisfies or attracts individuals.
 According to these theories, people have certain needs and/or desires that have been internalized as they have grown up.
 These theories analyze what is common to some people and pushes them to want to do what they do, and what are the factors of the context in which they live that push them to do or not do certain things.
 Among the most popular theories on content are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory.
 In general, when managers start to manage their former colleagues, two behaviors can emerge. On the one hand, there are those who try to remain "one of the guys" (or the girls).
 The manager of this type finds it difficult to make unpopular decisions, to implement disciplinary actions, to evaluate performance, to define and assign responsibilities.
 At the opposite extreme, the manager becomes a completely different person, who feels he must change the entire work of the team and make it his own.
 In the end, the leader is the person who is ultimately responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This attitude often creates disagreements between leaders and the rest of the team.
 The standard of excellence for virtual teams is similar to that of conventional teams, but with some small differences.
 Members of the virtual team often have the function of contact point for their next physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than members of conventional teams, as matches can take place according to various time zones, which may not be covered by the local management.
 The existence of a real "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p109) is also a fundamental element of a virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the management team to which each member refers and is the one that establishes the standards for each member.
 Why would an organization want to go through the long process of building a learning organization? A good reason for implementing the concepts of organizational learning may be innovation.
 When all available resources are used effectively in all functional departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can emerge.
 Consequently, the path of collaboration within an organization to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 For an organization to be innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) illustrates the theory of the continuum as a method used to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological results have demonstrated the physical existence of a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition. The research area becomes narrower and therefore much more precise.
 The link between brain disease and behavior is the basis of the researchers' work.
 It has long been known that certain types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors can affect behavior and modify certain mental functions.
 The introduction of new technologies allows us to see and investigate brain structures and processes never observed before.
 This gives us a great deal of information and material to create simulation models that help us understand our mental processes.
 Despite having a strong science fiction connotation, AI is a very important branch of computer science that deals with intelligent behavior, learning and adaptation of machines.
 AI research includes building machines that automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Some examples of application are control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnoses and questions, as well as the recognition of writing, vocal and facial.
 These things have become distinct disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to real problems.
 AI is now often used in economics, medicine, engineering and the military, as well as being integrated into various software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are an important part of the curriculum. Often teachers would like to take their students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 The solution is offered by technology with virtual tours. Students can see museum artifacts, visit an aquarium or admire beautiful works of art while sitting in class.
 Sharing a virtual school trip is also a great excuse to share travel experiences and reflections with future classes.
 For example, every year the students of Bennet School, North Carolina, design a website about their trip to the capital; the website is redesigned every year, but the previous versions are kept online and become an album.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing. Often, their first experiences with blogging are marked by poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of an audience usually changes things.
 Since students are usually the most critical audience, to avoid negative judgments the blog author is committed to improving writing.
 Blogs also "force students to become more aware of the moment they are in" (Toto, 2004). The need to feed the public's interest motivates students to be ingenious and interesting.
 The blog is a tool that aims to encourage collaboration and develop student learning beyond the normal school day.
 The proper use of blogs "can help students become more critical and analytical. By actively responding to Internet materials, students can define their own position within the writings of others, as well as delineate their own perspectives on specific issues" (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the charming and bilingual capital of Canada, full of art galleries and museums that tell the past and present of the country.
 Further south are the Niagara Falls and to the north you can admire the natural beauty of the Muskoka region and much more.
 All this and more makes Ontario typically Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 The vast areas to the north are sparsely populated, some of them are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 If you compare the population, the result may be surprising for many: in the United States the number of African-American citizens is higher than that of Canadian citizens.
 The islands of East Africa are located in the Indian Ocean, off the east coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and its natural heritage makes it a continent in its own right.
 Almost all the smaller islands, known as luxurious beach resorts, are mostly independent nations or associated with France.
 In the lands the Arabs also brought Islam, which began a long journey to the Comoros and Mayotte.
 In the 15th century, the discovery of the Cape Route, which goes from Europe to India, by the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama opened the way to European influence and colonialism.
 To the north, the region is bordered by the Sahel, while to the south and west it borders the Atlantic Ocean.
 For female travellers: it is recommended that all women declare that they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It is also useful to wear a ring (but not one that looks too expensive).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can lead to what they consider to be harassment, and that it is not unusual to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in rejecting men, and do not be afraid to oppose them (cultural differences or not, there is no excuse!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC; under the name of Anfa, it was a strategic port used by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinides.
 The Portuguese destroyed it to rebuild it under the name of Casa Branca, which they abandoned in 1755 following an earthquake.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city, which was called Daru l-Badya, then called Casablanca by the Spanish merchants who chose these places for their commercial bases.
 Throughout Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting cities for shopping.
 In the surroundings of the old Medina it is easy to find places that sell traditional Moroccan products, such as tajin, ceramics, leather goods, hookahs and lots of trinkets, but all this is reserved only for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the easternmost part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, not far from Rwanda.
 In 2002, the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma, burying most of the city's streets, especially those in the center.
 While Goma is reasonably safe, it is advisable to do some research before making any visits outside of Goma, in order to assess the state of the ongoing clashes in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano, as well as being one of the least expensive opportunities to see the mountain gorillas of Africa.
 It is possible to use a boda-boda (motorcycle taxi) to move around Goma. The normal price (in local currency) is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Also because of its relative inaccessibility, "Timbuktu" has ended up becoming a metaphor for exotic and distant land.
 Today Timbuktu is a decaying city, but for its reputation remains a tourist attraction, also equipped with an airport.
 In 1990 it was included in the list of Unesco heritage sites that are in danger, due to the threat posed by the sands of the desert.
 It was one of the main stops on Henry Louis Gates' PBS special "Wonders of the African World."
 With its more Arabic than African touch, the city stands out from the rest of the country.
 The Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeast of South Africa and runs east along the border with Mozambique, north borders with Zimbabwe, and its southern border is represented by the Crocodile River.
 With an area of 19,500 km², the park comprises 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different wildlife.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered the most important of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As with all South African national parks, there are daily conservation and park entrance fees.
 A Wild Card may also be useful, as it gives access to a selection of parks in South Africa or to all South African national parks.
 The island of Hong Kong, which gives its name to the entire territory, is the main destination for many tourists.
 The series of buildings that make up the skyline of Hong Kong has been likened to a glittering bar chart, made all the more striking by the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To enjoy the best views of Hong Kong, leave the island and visit the waterfront of Kowloon across the bay.
 Most of the urban development of Hong Kong Island has been concentrated on the reclaimed land of the densely populated northern coast.
 This is the place that the British colonizers chose for themselves, so if you are looking for evidence of the colonial past of this land, this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest contiguous mangrove forest in the world, extending 80 km (50 mi) from the coast into the hinterland of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans have been declared a World Heritage Site by UNESCO. The part of the forest included in the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 However, the forests are not only made up of mangrove swamps: they also contain what remains of the once vast jungles that covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which about one third is made up of marshy areas.
 Since 1966 the Sundarbans have been a sanctuary for wildlife; it is estimated that there are 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 Buses leave from the inter-district bus station (on the other side of the river) throughout the day, although many (especially those going east and to Jakar/Bumthang) leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Since the buses between districts are often full, it is best to buy your ticket a few days in advance.
 Most of the neighborhoods are served by comfortable and sturdy small Japanese buses.
 Shared taxis are a convenient and fast way to reach nearby locations, including Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that connects the city of Oiapoque, Brazil, to Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 Its two pylons are 83 meters high, it is 378 meters long and has two lanes 3.50 meters wide.
 Under the bridge the free vertical space is 15 meters. The construction was completed in August 2011, but the opening to traffic took place only in March 2017.
 By September 2017, when Brazilian customs checkpoints are likely to be completed, the bridge should be fully operational.
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group living in present-day eastern Paraguay. They were semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers and also practised subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was inhabited by other groups of indigenous tribes such as the Guaycuru and the Payaguá, who lived off hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called "The Great Province of the Indies", was born in the sixteenth century from the encounter between Spanish conquerors and indigenous native groups.
 The Spanish started a period that lasted three centuries, the period of colonization.
 Since the foundation of Asunción in 1537, Paraguay has been able to maintain much of its identity and its own characteristics.
 Everyone knows that Argentina boasts one of the best teams and the best polo players in the world.
 In December, the most important tournament of the year takes place in the Las Cañitas polo fields.
 Here you can watch minor tournaments and matches even at other times of the year.
 For information on tournaments and tickets for polo matches, please contact the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The Falkland Islands have their own official currency, the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), which is equivalent to the British pound sterling (GBP).
 The only bank on the islands, located in Stanley opposite the FIC West shop, offers currency exchange services.
 British pounds are generally accepted everywhere on the islands. In Stanley, you can often pay with credit cards and US dollars.
 It is likely that the outer islands will not accept credit cards, although British and US currency may be accepted. Check with the owners in advance to decide on an acceptable method of payment.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the islands, so change your money before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is south of the Equator, it is summer when it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropical region; during the summer months temperatures above 30°C are quite normal.
 Winter can be deceptively cold: temperatures rarely drop below freezing, but the combination of wind and humidity gives the impression of a lower temperature than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no defined "dry" and "rainy" seasons: the amount of rain remains almost constant throughout the year.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to human visitors, the wildlife is still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 Park authorities recommend keeping a distance of at least 100 yards/meters from bears and wolves and 25 yards/meters from all other wildlife.
 No matter how docile they may seem: bison, moose, deer, bears, practically all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured for not keeping a proper distance. It is necessary to leave these animals a proper space as they are large, wild and potentially dangerous animals.
 Also, keep in mind that odors can attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid bringing or cooking foods with strong odors, and keep your camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of the Samoa Islands. It is located on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded between 1850 and 1860 and is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In this port there was the infamous naval standoff of 1889, in which seven ships from Germany, the United States and Great Britain refused to leave the port.
 All the ships were sunk, except for a British cruiser. Nearly 200 American and German lives were lost.
 During the struggle for independence organized by the Mau movement, a peaceful rally in the city led to the killing of Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, the supreme chief.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is located between two harbours. The most popular are divided into three areas.
 The beaches facing the Pacific Ocean of the North Shore (in the district of North Harbour) extend from Long Bay to the north to Devonport to the south.
 These are mainly sandy beaches, safe for swimming, and most of them enjoy the shade of pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive in Auckland Central, in the elegant suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, overlook the port of Waitemata.
 These are family-friendly beaches, sometimes a bit crowded, surrounded by a wide choice of shops and safe for swimming.
 The most famous local beer is a simple, refreshing and pleasant beer called "Number One". The other local beer is called "Manta".
 You can have many French wines, but Australian and New Zealand wines could better face the journey.
 The tap water is totally safe to drink, but if you are worried, bottled water is easy to find.
 According to Australians, the flat white coffee is a foreign idea. The espresso is the short black coffee, the cappuccino is covered with cream (not foam) and tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is on the same level as Belgian chocolate. Fruit juices are expensive, but very good.
 Throughout the year, many excursions are made to the coral reef and accidents for one of these causes on the coral reef are rare.
 Always ask for advice from the authorities, follow the instructions and pay particular attention to the safety warnings.
 Cubomedusae appear from October to April near the beaches and estuaries of the rivers north of Seventeen Seventy. Outside this period they can only be found occasionally.
 Sharks are present, but rarely attack humans. Most sharks are afraid of humans and tend to keep their distance.
 The habitat of saltwater crocodiles is mainly the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton, not actively living in the ocean.
 By booking in advance, the traveller has the peace of mind of finding a place to sleep once he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agencies often have special agreements with certain hotels, but it is still possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping, through the same agencies.
 Travel agencies generally offer packages including breakfast, transfers to / from the airport or even combined flight + hotel.
 They can also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get additional documents required for your destination (e.g. visa).
 However, any changes or requests must be made before the travel agent and not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, most of the participants choose to camp on site, considering this an essential part of the experience.
 To be close to the action, you need to get there early and grab a spot near the music.
 Remember that once the music on the main stages is over, there may be sections of the festival where the music continues until late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the Baltic Sea in winter, check the location of the cabin, since the crossing of the ice causes rather annoying noises for those who are more exposed.
 St. Petersburg cruises include time for exploring the city. Cruise passengers are granted visa-free entry (check conditions).
 Casinos generally do everything they can to increase the time and money spent by their guests. There are usually no windows or clocks, and exits can be hard to find.
 They usually offer food, drinks and entertainment to keep the guests happy and to keep them staying.
 In some establishments, alcoholic beverages are offered by the house. However, intoxication impairs judgment and every good gambler knows how important it is to stay sober.
 Anyone who decides to drive at high altitudes or on mountain passes must take into account the possibility of snow, ice or temperatures close to zero.
 On icy and snowy roads, friction is reduced and it is not possible to drive as when you are on clean asphalt.
 In a snowstorm, so much snow can fall in a short time that you can get stuck.
 Even precipitation and gusts of snow, or the formation of ice or condensation on the vehicle windows, can reduce visibility.
 However, ice and snow are normal conditions in many countries, and traffic continues to flow almost uninterrupted throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the focus of many visitors' holidays.
 In its popular usage, the term safari refers to overland travel, particularly in the savannah, to see the beautiful African wildlife.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to come closer to cars, so a normal camera equipment is sufficient to get a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and can be observed better with binoculars.
 A walking safari (also called "bush walk", "safari escursionistico", or "safari on foot") is an excursion that can last a few hours or several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2012, and some events will be held in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Summer Olympic Games, having hosted the first in 1964.
 If your booking for flights and accommodation for 2020 was made before the postponement was announced, you may find yourself in a difficult situation.
 Cancellation policies vary, but most coronavirus-related cancellation policies as of late March 2020 do not extend past July 2020, when the Olympics are scheduled to take place.
 It is expected that the cost of most event tickets will be between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, while regular tickets will cost around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help them dry faster. Many hotels offer the use of an iron and ironing board, even if they are not in the room.
 If you don't have an iron, or if you don't like wearing ironed socks, you can try a hair dryer, if you have one.
 Be careful not to subject the fabrics to excessively high temperatures, to avoid shrinkage or, in the worst case, burns.
 There are various ways to sanitize water and some of these are more effective against specific risks.
 In some areas, it is enough to boil the water for a minute, in others it takes many minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters is variable, so in case of doubt it is advisable to evaluate the purchase of water packaged in sealed bottles from a reliable company.
 Travellers may come into contact with animal parasites that are not found in their home regions.
 Parasites can spoil food, cause irritation or, in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, as well as transmit poison or infections.
 The same infectious diseases and dangerous animals that can injure or kill people with force are not usually classified as harmful animals.
 Duty Free shopping is an opportunity to buy tax-free products in certain locations.
 Travelers heading to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot, especially on products like alcohol and tobacco.
 The Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway between Point Marion and Fairmont is the one with the most difficult driving conditions, as it often crosses isolated areas among the vegetation.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, it is advisable to keep your eyes wide open, as there are steep slopes, narrow roads and sharp bends.
 The speed limits shown are much lower than those applied in the previous and subsequent sections (normally 35-40 mph / 56-64 km/h). Their strict observance is extremely important.
 Strangely, however, in this area the level of coverage of the mobile phone service is much higher than that present in other stretches of the route, for example in the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German desserts are quite good and in Bavaria are quite tasty and varied, similar to those of neighboring Austria further south.
 Fruit desserts are a timeless classic, from apples available all year round to cherries and plums, which make their appearance during the summer.
 Several German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. The most popular cakes often go very well with a cup of strong coffee.
 Those who want to taste small but tasty cakes can opt for those that, depending on the region, are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen.
 Curry is a dish made with herbs and spices combined with meat or vegetables.
 Curry can be "dry" or "wet", depending on the amount of liquid it contains.
 In northern India and Pakistan, curries in the interior regions are normally made with yogurt; in southern India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is more commonly used.
 With 17,000 islands to choose from, the term Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that covers a wide variety of regional cuisines found in the country.
 However, when used without further specification, the term generally refers to foods originating from the central and eastern parts of the main island, Java.
 The cuisine of Java, now widely spread throughout the archipelago, offers a series of dishes of simple preparation; its predominant flavors are given by the use of peanuts, chili peppers, sugar (especially the Javanese coconut sugar) and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are supports for the rider's feet and are hung on the two sides of the saddle.
 They guarantee greater stability to the rider but can present safety problems for the possibility that the feet of the rider remain blocked.
 If a jockey is thrown off a horse but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he could be dragged along by the horse as it runs away. To minimise this risk, there are some safety measures that can be taken.
 First of all, most knights wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, rather thin sole.
 Later, some saddles, especially English ones, have included safety bars, which make a leather strap break from the saddle when, in case of a fall, the rider pulls it back.
 Cochamó Valley: the most important climbing destination in Chile, known as the Yosemite of South America, where a large number of enormous granite walls and cliffs are found.
 The peaks of the mountains include breathtaking views. Climbers from all over the world are constantly tracing new routes on its walls, potentially infinite.
 Snow sports such as downhill skiing and snowboarding are very popular and involve sliding down snow using skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is one of the main tourist activities and boasts many fans, sometimes even called "ski bums", who dedicate entire periods of vacation to skiing in a particular area.
 The principle behind skiing is very old: the first cave paintings with the depiction of humans skiing date back to 5000 BC!
 Alpine skiing as a sport has its origins at least in the seventeenth century; in 1861 the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by the Norwegians.
 Ski touring: the activity is also called off-piste, ski mountaineering or ski trekking.
 It is related, although it does not usually include them, to ski touring or skimo, which are practiced on steep terrain and require much stiffer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 If the conditions are good, you can cover distances somewhat greater than when walking, but only very rarely will you reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy backpack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it is made up of many independent countries. Normally, to travel through several countries you would need to apply for a visa and passport control several times.
 However, in this respect, the Schengen area functions more like a single country.
 If you stay within this area, you can normally go from one border to the other without having to go through passport control again.
 Similarly, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for individual visas for the member countries, thus saving time, money and bureaucracy.
 There is no universal definition of what makes an item an antique. Some tax agencies consider an item to be an antique if it is at least 100 years old.
 The definition has geographical differences from the age limit which may be lower, as in the case of North America compared to Europe.
 Crafts objects could be defined as antiques, even if they are more recent than similar mass-produced items.
 Reindeer husbandry is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi and the culture on which this trade is based is also the basis for many other professions.
 Even over time, not all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer herding; some lived off fishing, hunting and similar activities, using reindeer mainly as work animals.
 Today many Sámi have modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi homeland.
 Although widely used, especially among non-Roma, the word "gypsy" is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and a misperception of Roma people.
 If a travel warning is issued for the destination you are visiting, there may be consequences for your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You may also be interested in the opinions of governments other than your own, but keep in mind that these opinions are aimed at the citizens of those governments.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may encounter different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 The bulletins simply provide a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The opinions reported are often superficial, generic and simplistic compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 "Adverse weather conditions" is the general expression used to describe any dangerous weather phenomenon that can cause damage, serious social disruption or loss of life.
 Extreme weather conditions can occur anywhere in the world, and there are many different types, depending on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, above-average precipitation and uncontrolled fires are manifestations and consequences of adverse weather conditions, such as thunderstorms, tornadoes, sea-spray and cyclones.
 Among the phenomena of strong regional and seasonal intensity are thunderstorms, snowstorms, ice storms and sandstorms.
 Travellers are advised to check the weather conditions in their area, as they may affect their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country that is potentially considered a war zone should undergo professional training.
 Searching the Internet for 'Survival Course' is likely to find the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the issues discussed here in much more detail, usually with practical experience.
 A course normally lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes role-playing games, as well as many first aid and sometimes weapons training activities.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, while publications about war zones are rare.
 Travellers planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad should ensure they have valid travel documents for their return journey.
 The intention of governments to issue passports without gender indications (X) or updated documents to match a desired name and gender is variable.
 Equally variable is the willingness of foreign governments to accept such documents.
 Even security checks have become much more thorough in the post-September 11, 2001 era.
 Transgender people in the pre-operative phase should not expect to pass through the controls without their privacy and dignity being affected.
 Rip currents are formed by the return flow of waves breaking on the beach, often near a coral reef or similar formation.
 Given the submarine topography, the return flow is concentrated in some deeper sections where a strong current can form towards the open sea.
 Most deaths occur due to exhaustion in the attempt to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, swimming back will not be as difficult as normal.
 Try to find a place where you won't be trapped again, or consider waiting for help, depending on your skills and whether you've been spotted.
 Re-entry shock is manifested in a shorter time than cultural shock (there being a "honeymoon" phase more reduced), lasts longer and can be more serious.
 Travelers who have found it easy to adapt to the new culture sometimes have difficulty readjusting to the culture of their home country.
 When you return home after living abroad, you will have adapted to the new culture and lost some of the customs of your home culture.
 In your first experience abroad, you are likely to have encountered patient and understanding people, aware that travelers in a new country need to adjust.
 Many people did not imagine that patience and awareness were also necessary for those who return home.
 The light and sound show at the pyramid is the most interesting thing for children in the area.
 Before the show begins, you can admire the pyramids in the darkness and silence.
 Normally you always hear the noise caused by tourists and vendors. The show of sounds and lights is just like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx becomes the backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are projected onto the pyramids and each pyramid is illuminated.
 Claimed by various countries, the South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, have the highest number of bases, sixteen of which were active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 km north of the peninsula. King George Island is the largest and is home to the town of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Among the other islands are Livingston Island and Deception; in the latter, the caldera of an active volcano filled with water has given rise to a magnificent natural harbor.
 Ellsworth Land is the region that lies south of the peninsula and faces the Bellingshausen Sea.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula merge into the plateau, to then re-emerge and form the Ellsworth Mountains, a 360 km long chain cut in two by the Minnesota Glacier.
 The northern part, known as the Sentinel Range, boasts the highest mountains in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which reaches 4,892 m with Mount Vinson.
 In remote areas, where there is no cell phone coverage, a satellite phone may be the only possible alternative.
 A satellite phone is not generally a substitute for a cell phone, because you have to be outdoors with a clear view of the satellite to make a call.
 The service is often used by pleasure craft, including pleasure craft, as well as by missions that need data and voice at a distance.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to provide you with more information about connecting to this service.
 One of the most popular options for those who plan to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 It is particularly popular among recent graduates, since they can take a year off before starting university without compromising their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a course abroad in the sabbatical year can actually increase the chances of resuming higher education upon return to the home country.
 Usually enrollment in these educational programs requires payment of a fee.
 Finland is a great destination for boating. In the "Land of a thousand lakes" there are also thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 You don’t need a yacht for the archipelagos and lakes.
 Although the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are certainly large enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Boating is the national pastime of Finland, where there is one boat for every seven or eight people.
 This is also the case in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but is generally quite unusual (in the Netherlands, for example, the ratio is one to forty).
 Most of the different Baltic cruises include a multi-day stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you can visit the historic town for two full days, returning to the ship in the evening to sleep.
 No separate visa is required for disembarkation (as of 2009) using the ship's shore excursions.
 Some brochures also offer cruises to Berlin, Germany. As you can see from the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and the visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying can be scary for people of all ages and conditions, especially if they have never flown before or have had some traumatic experience.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of: it is not unlike the fears and aversions that many people have towards other things.
 For some people, understanding a little bit about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can be helpful in overcoming a fear based on the unknown or the feeling of being out of control.
 Courier services are well paid to deliver products quickly. Often the timing is very important in the case of business documents, goods or spare parts for an urgent repair.
 For some routes the larger companies used their own aircraft, but for other routes and for smaller companies there were problems.
 On some routes, air shipments would have taken days to clear customs and unload.
 The only way to get it there faster would be to ship it as checked baggage, and that's where you come in, since airline regulations don't allow baggage to be shipped without a passenger.
 To fly first class or business class, the obvious way is to pay a lot of money for the privilege (or, even better, convince your company to do it).
 However, the price to pay is high: you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for Business travel and up to eleven times the fare for First Class travel!
 In general, on flights from A to B, it is not even worth looking for discounts on first class or business class seats.
 Airlines know that there is a category of travelers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of arriving quickly and comfortably at their destination, and as a result they apply certain tariffs.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau and the local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has been the scene of an ethnic conflict in the past.
 In 1994, the conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistria Republic in the eastern part of Moldova, with its own government and currency, but not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic relations between these two parts of Moldova have been restored.
 The predominant religion in Moldova is Christian Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million inhabitants; it is the second largest port after Istanbul and an important transport hub.
 The ancient city of Smyrna is located on a huge bay, is surrounded by mountains and is currently a modern, developed and active commercial center.
 Although the city has a Mediterranean feel, with wide boulevards, glass-fronted buildings and modern shopping centres, it is dotted with the characteristic red-tiled roofs, the 18th-century market and ancient mosques and churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik you can enjoy beautiful views of the nearby island of Eysturoy and you can visit a unique octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, on some of the tombs, there are interesting marble sculptures of doves.
 Half an hour is enough to walk around the charming village.
 To the north is the romantic and enchanting city of Sintra, easily accessible. It became famous in the eyes of foreigners thanks to the brilliant story of its splendor written by Lord Byron.
 The Scotturb 403 bus line regularly connects with Sintra, and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also to the north, visit the great sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima (place of worship), a place of Marian apparitions famous throughout the world.
 Remember that the site you are visiting is basically a mass grave, and has an incalculable significance for a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who survived these places, and many others who saw their loved ones murdered or worked to death, both Jews and non-Jews.
 Treat the place with all the dignity, seriousness and respect it deserves. Avoid jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Please do not deface these places by marking the structures with graffiti.
 In the city of Barcelona, the official languages are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the population prefers to speak Catalan, the vast majority is able to understand it; Spanish is known by almost everyone.
 However, most signs are written exclusively in Catalan, which is by law the first official language.
 Spanish, however, is also widely used for public transport and other services.
 On the metro, regular announcements are only in Catalan, but any unscheduled service interruptions are communicated in a wide variety of languages including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese, thanks to an automated system.
 Parisians are known to be self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although it is often just an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to feel at home in Paris is to behave as a "bien élevé" (well-mannered) person, which will definitely facilitate your movements.
 The rough exterior of Parisians will quickly disappear if you show some basic good manners.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is rich in forests, mainly beech, pine and fir, and is characterized by a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Thanks to a multiplicity of microclimates, soils and altitude levels, it presents a great variety of plant communities.
 The area also hosts a great variety of animal and bird species.
 In these places live rare species such as the European brown bear, the wolf, the eagle, the owl, the lynx, the wild cat and the capercaillie, along with several other animal species more widespread.
 When visiting monasteries, women are required to wear skirts that cover their knees and to cover their shoulders.
 Most monasteries will provide stoles for women who arrive unprepared, but if you have one already, especially if it is brightly coloured, you will earn a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 Similarly, men are required to wear long pants below the knees.
 These can also be borrowed from the cloakroom at the entrance; however, the garments are not washed after each user, so you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts. For men, one size fits all!
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of similar areas of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork) and uses olive oil everywhere.
 Pa amb Oli is a simple popular dish, typical of the summer season: bread with olive oil, tomato and all the condiments available, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, as well as the pronoun "Sie" used for the polite form of "you", always begin with a capital letter, even if they appear in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important mechanism for distinguishing certain verbs and complements.
 This aspect probably also facilitates reading, although the need to understand whether a verb or an adjective is used in a substantivized form makes the writing rather complex.
 Italian pronunciation is relatively simple since most words are pronounced as they are written.
 The main letters to pay attention to are the c and the g, since their pronunciation changes depending on the vowel that follows.
 Also make sure you pronounce "r" and "rr" differently: caro means dear, while carro means carriage.
 Persian has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 So, reading this basic grammar book could help you a lot with Persian grammar and in understanding sentences.
 It goes without saying that if you already know a Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, people with a minimal knowledge of Spanish may come to the precipitous conclusion that Portuguese is similar enough and therefore need not be studied separately.
 Usually nowadays pre-modern observatories are obsolete and serve as museums or educational places.
 Since light pollution was not a problem in their heyday, they are usually located in cities or on campuses, which are more easily accessible than those built in modern times.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge structures in remote locations where the weather is favorable.
 The admiration of the cherry blossoms, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 The concept was originally from China, where the flowering of plum trees was preferred.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were organized by the emperor for himself and other members of the aristocracy close to the imperial court.
 Plants do their best when they are in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to take even just one plant.
 If you visit an Italian garden, even picking up a few specimens of plants will cost you the removal from this place, without discussion.
 In general, Singapore is a very safe and easy city to get around; you can buy just about anything once you arrive.
 But being in the "high tropics", only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to deal with the heat (always) and the strong sun (more rarely, when the sky is clear).
 Some buses also go north to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Bible's patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you want to take goes into Hebron and does not stop at the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a great theme around which to organize a holiday.
 For example, you can visit the castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, you can take a cruise to visit the interesting cities on the Danube or you can sail on the Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes of very well-known hiking trails and bicycle paths.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity and celebrates the birth of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions associated with this holiday have been adopted by non-Christians in Christian countries and by non-Christians around the world.
 A tradition is to spend the Easter night awake in an open place to be able to admire the dawn.
 There are of course Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian fertility ritual.
 In more traditional churches, a Paschal Vigil is often held on the Saturday night of the Easter weekend, with congregations often beginning the ceremony at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that originally came to the islands arrived by swimming, flying or floating.
 Because the distance from the mainland was considerable, mammals could not make the journey, which meant that the giant tortoise became the main grazing animal on the Galapagos.
 Many mammals such as goats, horses, cows, rats, dogs and cats were introduced to the Galapagos after the arrival of humans.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic during the winter, you will experience polar night, when the sun remains below the horizon.
 This phenomenon offers the possibility of witnessing the aurora borealis, because the sky remains dark almost all day.
 Since the territories are sparsely populated, light pollution is often not a problem and you can also enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners tend to be used to.
 Office wear normally consists of a jacket and tie or a suit and one addresses colleagues by their surname or professional title.
 The harmony of the workplace is of crucial importance, as it gives importance to the commitment of the group rather than praising individual achievements.
 Workers must often receive the approval of their superiors for every decision, and are expected to follow instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.3485174026286456, 'precisions': [0.6615337115510787, 0.4135105827543275, 0.2794406999623226, 0.19300546448087433], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0481372112778609, 'translation_length': 25911, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 63.272606303822656, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8817139891649894, 'scores': [0.870904803276062, 0.8848881721496582, 0.8992717266082764, 0.7905129194259644, 0.8874218463897705, 0.8191052079200745, 0.9094457626342773, 0.8992654085159302, 0.9036543965339661, 0.8466153740882874, 0.849437415599823, 0.9159510731697083, 0.899020254611969, 0.8984681963920593, 0.8902002573013306, 0.8350962996482849, 0.9058097004890442, 0.9303732514381409, 0.9299526810646057, 0.8494397401809692, 0.9224008917808533, 0.8241982460021973, 0.8241872787475586, 0.8686953186988831, 0.881969153881073, 0.915443480014801, 0.8266385197639465, 0.897550106048584, 0.8913858532905579, 0.875156044960022, 0.8150280714035034, 0.8027999997138977, 0.8305365443229675, 0.9095376133918762, 0.9311528205871582, 0.9344121813774109, 0.8864632844924927, 0.9143607020378113, 0.9128007292747498, 0.9367089867591858, 0.9044262170791626, 0.9392642378807068, 0.9181609749794006, 0.8981515765190125, 0.8169242143630981, 0.8837427496910095, 0.9190108180046082, 0.8824644684791565, 0.9446753263473511, 0.8916935920715332, 0.9394506216049194, 0.9290300011634827, 0.9031366109848022, 0.9406678676605225, 0.8895074129104614, 0.9098305106163025, 0.8811911940574646, 0.9089491367340088, 0.9317641258239746, 0.9428272247314453, 0.909766435623169, 0.9036138653755188, 0.8473422527313232, 0.8965898156166077, 0.8611563444137573, 0.9089161157608032, 0.8664689064025879, 0.8446564674377441, 0.909690260887146, 0.893582284450531, 0.8751835227012634, 0.8390451669692993, 0.8424294590950012, 0.8669502139091492, 0.8723382353782654, 0.8518120646476746, 0.8737106323242188, 0.9060905575752258, 0.929610013961792, 0.88267982006073, 0.8633790612220764, 0.9030499458312988, 0.823479950428009, 0.8716265559196472, 0.91023188829422, 0.8858216404914856, 0.8600232005119324, 0.8966439366340637, 0.9083589911460876, 0.8596558570861816, 0.9004129767417908, 0.8397848010063171, 0.8750537633895874, 0.9729294776916504, 0.9320163130760193, 0.9134817123413086, 0.7647513747215271, 0.8351350426673889, 0.8828428983688354, 0.8626448512077332, 0.9162253737449646, 0.9022830128669739, 0.8889748454093933, 0.9028034210205078, 0.9069689512252808, 0.8935937285423279, 0.8444185256958008, 0.9026972651481628, 0.8119032979011536, 0.869753897190094, 0.8986018300056458, 0.9234177470207214, 0.8875667452812195, 0.9178631901741028, 0.8673327565193176, 0.8262981176376343, 0.8895925879478455, 0.8895723819732666, 0.9382185339927673, 0.916320264339447, 0.8870157599449158, 0.8897761702537537, 0.9082401394844055, 0.8810940384864807, 0.91514652967453, 0.9034066796302795, 0.893257200717926, 0.9104710221290588, 0.9141983389854431, 0.9242143034934998, 0.9098867774009705, 0.8812530636787415, 0.8887948989868164, 0.9007463455200195, 0.8126874566078186, 0.8440804481506348, 0.8703386783599854, 0.8900583982467651, 0.930671751499176, 0.8722350597381592, 0.8971988558769226, 0.8963384628295898, 0.9367300868034363, 0.8741739988327026, 0.8302187919616699, 0.8813768625259399, 0.9057307839393616, 0.8921903371810913, 0.8798658847808838, 0.902110755443573, 0.8965151309967041, 0.9001797437667847, 0.8269603848457336, 0.8190155625343323, 0.8745387196540833, 0.9041106104850769, 0.9000696539878845, 0.8709837794303894, 0.9010854959487915, 0.879180371761322, 0.9010953307151794, 0.8656356930732727, 0.8896222114562988, 0.8830773234367371, 0.9160565733909607, 0.8263377547264099, 0.8998861908912659, 0.8652694225311279, 0.8779860138893127, 0.9005271792411804, 0.876979410648346, 0.9291794896125793, 0.9001173377037048, 0.8891194462776184, 0.8918883204460144, 0.8745740652084351, 0.8245346546173096, 0.9249918460845947, 0.862145721912384, 0.9174535274505615, 0.8711230754852295, 0.9288920760154724, 0.9344003796577454, 0.9357104897499084, 0.9045810103416443, 0.9172581434249878, 0.9391651749610901, 0.8922341465950012, 0.8738017082214355, 0.868014395236969, 0.7961781024932861, 0.7382178902626038, 0.85324627161026, 0.8588554859161377, 0.8900874257087708, 0.9181229472160339, 0.8743683099746704, 0.8315650224685669, 0.890742838382721, 0.9002938866615295, 0.8400897979736328, 0.8061580061912537, 0.8569182753562927, 0.7949028611183167, 0.823810875415802, 0.8619517087936401, 0.8628352880477905, 0.8734082579612732, 0.9179703593254089, 0.9314749836921692, 0.9379085898399353, 0.9099346995353699, 0.9290210008621216, 0.932279646396637, 0.8494119048118591, 0.9156765937805176, 0.8651993274688721, 0.9230889081954956, 0.9187567830085754, 0.8914874196052551, 0.9499371647834778, 0.9165027737617493, 0.9163694381713867, 0.9066749811172485, 0.8541730046272278, 0.7625842690467834, 0.8902139067649841, 0.8875538110733032, 0.8903891444206238, 0.839420735836029, 0.9003132581710815, 0.8810641765594482, 0.8535612225532532, 0.9141077399253845, 0.8700169920921326, 0.9025406241416931, 0.8834452629089355, 0.8417802453041077, 0.9326010346412659, 0.9149079918861389, 0.8322870135307312, 0.7689142823219299, 0.8784931898117065, 0.7865435481071472, 0.8493969440460205, 0.909795880317688, 0.8322671055793762, 0.8410917520523071, 0.8530182242393494, 0.9237838387489319, 0.9029931426048279, 0.9180076718330383, 0.9030243754386902, 0.926636278629303, 0.9350232481956482, 0.9061288833618164, 0.8097196221351624, 0.9069742560386658, 0.8811636567115784, 0.878282904624939, 0.9316665530204773, 0.8266218900680542, 0.8224239349365234, 0.9109801650047302, 0.9543736577033997, 0.8585987687110901, 0.8414738774299622, 0.8837527632713318, 0.9211490750312805, 0.8860959410667419, 0.8687165379524231, 0.8374506831169128, 0.9229657053947449, 0.8557499051094055, 0.6928237676620483, 0.7466278672218323, 0.8376193642616272, 0.8930126428604126, 0.8814490437507629, 0.942664384841919, 0.9033509492874146, 0.8177816271781921, 0.8694099187850952, 0.89007169008255, 0.9171636700630188, 0.9366021752357483, 0.8020808696746826, 0.8901734352111816, 0.8986268639564514, 0.8249827027320862, 0.8937390446662903, 0.827492892742157, 0.9162213206291199, 0.8949493169784546, 0.8578464388847351, 0.8852738738059998, 0.9026375412940979, 0.9335480332374573, 0.7648560404777527, 0.8847091197967529, 0.9290584325790405, 0.8473684191703796, 0.8740209937095642, 0.9041919112205505, 0.8582677245140076, 0.9072017073631287, 0.8577427268028259, 0.8239927887916565, 0.8889504075050354, 0.9075303077697754, 0.936784565448761, 0.8884219527244568, 0.9065573215484619, 0.720382571220398, 0.9208651185035706, 0.904473602771759, 0.9047861099243164, 0.8657548427581787, 0.9066150784492493, 0.8765117526054382, 0.8048815727233887, 0.8712345957756042, 0.9067426323890686, 0.8675069212913513, 0.8848169445991516, 0.8580314517021179, 0.8311857581138611, 0.8647733926773071, 0.9131043553352356, 0.9031254649162292, 0.8777256608009338, 0.8907027840614319, 0.9241581559181213, 0.8887935280799866, 0.9328970313072205, 0.9017391800880432, 0.9126599431037903, 0.8630780577659607, 0.8009607195854187, 0.8988217711448669, 0.8344518542289734, 0.9109358191490173, 0.8800227046012878, 0.8840522766113281, 0.8602427244186401, 0.9240304827690125, 0.8879731297492981, 0.8893083930015564, 0.8971745371818542, 0.8487894535064697, 0.8663249015808105, 0.8733550906181335, 0.8522911071777344, 0.9169279932975769, 0.8957623243331909, 0.9037118554115295, 0.8852399587631226, 0.8577429056167603, 0.8164109587669373, 0.8380835652351379, 0.8240772485733032, 0.86012202501297, 0.8923205733299255, 0.8272742033004761, 0.9407949447631836, 0.8049177527427673, 0.8411441445350647, 0.8570389747619629, 0.8395189642906189, 0.8541141748428345, 0.8652464747428894, 0.7916681170463562, 0.8505818247795105, 0.8739919066429138, 0.9355615973472595, 0.8944308757781982, 0.9054955840110779, 0.9119310975074768, 0.8570060133934021, 0.9145466685295105, 0.9395783543586731, 0.8939176797866821, 0.8175283074378967, 0.9061399698257446, 0.8949300646781921, 0.8570690751075745, 0.8305045962333679, 0.8640462756156921, 0.9080116748809814, 0.9105386734008789, 0.9049139022827148, 0.9103030562400818, 0.9255214929580688, 0.9245191216468811, 0.8628250956535339, 0.906797468662262, 0.8395046591758728, 0.9682779908180237, 0.8149958848953247, 0.9005035758018494, 0.9105187058448792, 0.820655882358551, 0.9220656156539917, 0.8719049692153931, 0.854415237903595, 0.8730679154396057, 0.8826029896736145, 0.869579017162323, 0.9370513558387756, 0.9083880186080933, 0.9021463990211487, 0.8347582221031189, 0.7681663036346436, 0.918172299861908, 0.8925327062606812, 0.9128078818321228, 0.8562327027320862, 0.8745843768119812, 0.9138283729553223, 0.9192569851875305, 0.9130992293357849, 0.8644686341285706, 0.8689577579498291, 0.8237278461456299, 0.8761706948280334, 0.8942254185676575, 0.8999776840209961, 0.9180364012718201, 0.8958940505981445, 0.9081819653511047, 0.8857253193855286, 0.8732487559318542, 0.8162901997566223, 0.8773902058601379, 0.6966791749000549, 0.9032302498817444, 0.8876386284828186, 0.9224363565444946, 0.8608880639076233, 0.8950768113136292, 0.8935124278068542, 0.9054084420204163, 0.9427966475486755, 0.8921064734458923, 0.8790807127952576, 0.8485477566719055, 0.9436435699462891, 0.9217217564582825, 0.9045354723930359, 0.878261387348175, 0.903350293636322, 0.8629963397979736, 0.921423077583313, 0.8843478560447693, 0.8515052199363708, 0.8795828819274902, 0.8803364634513855, 0.8828315138816833, 0.8746089935302734, 0.8636404871940613, 0.9260160326957703, 0.8850962519645691, 0.8536475300788879, 0.8799133896827698, 0.8852265477180481, 0.8739746809005737, 0.8822023272514343, 0.8120341897010803, 0.838507354259491, 0.8390078544616699, 0.7789645791053772, 0.8050369620323181, 0.851273238658905, 0.8557788729667664, 0.8139049410820007, 0.8863065242767334, 0.8422487378120422, 0.8269844651222229, 0.9199742674827576, 0.9286170601844788, 0.92430180311203, 0.8560134172439575, 0.9005374312400818, 0.8424458503723145, 0.9038904309272766, 0.8519893288612366, 0.9145243763923645, 0.8421772122383118, 0.883563220500946, 0.9124169945716858, 0.9000248312950134, 0.8964477777481079, 0.9155328869819641, 0.9104117155075073, 0.8224523067474365, 0.8684013485908508, 0.8899552226066589, 0.9078721404075623, 0.9319472312927246, 0.8829717040061951, 0.9221823811531067, 0.9382765889167786, 0.9134015440940857, 0.8749422430992126, 0.7968270182609558, 0.9352619647979736, 0.834788978099823, 0.8952485918998718, 0.8572253584861755, 0.854712724685669, 0.8295308351516724, 0.7817453145980835, 0.8432710766792297, 0.7744529843330383, 0.8795544505119324, 0.9301995635032654, 0.8151130676269531, 0.9598352313041687, 0.888834536075592, 0.934057354927063, 0.8728237748146057, 0.9175103306770325, 0.9048696160316467, 0.8696995973587036, 0.9211583733558655, 0.8818495869636536, 0.870798647403717, 0.845824122428894, 0.8651562333106995, 0.8790126442909241, 0.897663414478302, 0.8897948861122131, 0.8586561679840088, 0.8783072233200073, 0.8859509825706482, 0.8380709290504456, 0.8466830849647522, 0.7638667225837708, 0.8744264841079712, 0.8922696709632874, 0.8705905675888062, 0.9219033718109131, 0.9031925797462463, 0.899859607219696, 0.8953081965446472, 0.9238776564598083, 0.8959664702415466, 0.8915781378746033, 0.8604870438575745, 0.9421680569648743, 0.8153078556060791, 0.8925054669380188, 0.8840546607971191, 0.9107799530029297, 0.9277896285057068, 0.7908174395561218, 0.8422186970710754, 0.8877412676811218, 0.8515658378601074, 0.8251115679740906, 0.8920363783836365, 0.8571990728378296, 0.8515529632568359, 0.8668089509010315, 0.8599547743797302, 0.8698819279670715, 0.8584320545196533, 0.8835704922676086, 0.8971489667892456, 0.8258870840072632, 0.864022433757782, 0.9274515509605408, 0.8079192042350769, 0.9102280735969543, 0.8389639258384705, 0.7684115171432495, 0.8976203799247742, 0.8923417925834656, 0.9172379970550537, 0.9174244403839111, 0.8864102959632874, 0.9530249834060669, 0.9039821028709412, 0.8673593401908875, 0.8290823101997375, 0.8941212892532349, 0.8963506817817688, 0.8778524994850159, 0.8595912456512451, 0.9034033417701721, 0.9180183410644531, 0.9140525460243225, 0.8524085879325867, 0.9285349249839783, 0.9054546356201172, 0.8999695181846619, 0.8898001909255981, 0.8883768320083618, 0.8626452088356018, 0.881278395652771, 0.9145632982254028, 0.8372353911399841, 0.8941822648048401, 0.9067367911338806, 0.9091143012046814, 0.9127487540245056, 0.8055986762046814, 0.8446901440620422, 0.7542303204536438, 0.8808096051216125, 0.882461667060852, 0.9061853885650635, 0.8869431614875793, 0.8950722217559814, 0.8845110535621643, 0.9069077968597412, 0.8932371139526367, 0.9107045531272888, 0.9132544994354248, 0.8631010055541992, 0.8392110466957092, 0.7956899404525757, 0.9199637174606323, 0.9043523669242859, 0.8612130284309387, 0.9035389423370361, 0.9076395034790039, 0.9104113578796387, 0.9039981961250305, 0.900664746761322, 0.8462546467781067, 0.8820300698280334, 0.8974562883377075, 0.9399831891059875, 0.9561322927474976, 0.9012300372123718, 0.904214084148407, 0.8844615817070007, 0.9185004830360413, 0.9674203991889954, 0.8992708325386047, 0.944075345993042, 0.8683099150657654, 0.8735617995262146, 0.8837555050849915, 0.6574637293815613, 0.8828465938568115, 0.8889120221138, 0.8535943627357483, 0.8915913701057434, 0.935528039932251, 0.9149260520935059, 0.8641637563705444, 0.8604853749275208, 0.8840985894203186, 0.9247229099273682, 0.8473780751228333, 0.9034180641174316, 0.8483352065086365, 0.8528466820716858, 0.8317456841468811, 0.9052639603614807, 0.9106429815292358, 0.889658510684967, 0.9122857451438904, 0.8486632704734802, 0.9107362627983093, 0.902492105960846, 0.8994511365890503, 0.9400623440742493, 0.8913698196411133, 0.9325829744338989, 0.9058119654655457, 0.8299509882926941, 0.8762034773826599, 0.8977908492088318, 0.9273165464401245, 0.9187080264091492, 0.924138605594635, 0.9382937550544739, 0.8694874048233032, 0.949324905872345, 0.8955783247947693, 0.8848957419395447, 0.8796247243881226, 0.8869261145591736, 0.8756961226463318, 0.890145480632782, 0.8927887082099915, 0.8619385361671448, 0.8806748986244202, 0.9012022614479065, 0.8932422995567322, 0.8782446980476379, 0.8482773303985596, 0.9155609011650085, 0.8531414866447449, 0.9105974435806274, 0.8691685795783997, 0.9152938723564148, 0.7482749819755554, 0.886355996131897, 0.902712881565094, 0.8989217281341553, 0.9227262139320374, 0.8993199467658997, 0.8187538385391235, 0.9034262299537659, 0.8865577578544617, 0.8899586200714111, 0.9143908023834229, 0.8572705388069153, 0.907283365726471, 0.8768481016159058, 0.8828170895576477, 0.8466637134552002, 0.8992855548858643, 0.9069344401359558, 0.8548965454101562, 0.9085188508033752, 0.9061550498008728, 0.8424343466758728, 0.8887459635734558, 0.9156045913696289, 0.9304115772247314, 0.937540590763092, 0.8865058422088623, 0.8679260015487671, 0.8493911623954773, 0.8948116898536682, 0.8806191682815552, 0.9164113402366638, 0.8905842900276184, 0.9124315977096558, 0.8781690001487732, 0.9156317710876465, 0.8999239802360535, 0.8917983174324036, 0.895020067691803, 0.8923299312591553, 0.9195696711540222, 0.829660177230835, 0.8410367369651794, 0.8791237473487854, 0.9166563749313354, 0.9118521809577942, 0.9091882109642029, 0.8939442038536072, 0.9013739228248596, 0.8939885497093201, 0.9130597710609436, 0.904518187046051, 0.7999243140220642, 0.8948712944984436, 0.8914117813110352, 0.8839194774627686, 0.8682709336280823, 0.897756040096283, 0.8894311785697937, 0.9098532795906067, 0.9317094683647156, 0.9313114285469055, 0.94732266664505, 0.8691819906234741, 0.9003080725669861, 0.9085254073143005, 0.8947866559028625, 0.9072607159614563, 0.9153191447257996, 0.9331889152526855, 0.8827980160713196, 0.9489587545394897, 0.8936416506767273, 0.8979525566101074, 0.8943004608154297, 0.9037952423095703, 0.8511911034584045, 0.8837044835090637, 0.8893665671348572, 0.7849259972572327, 0.913569986820221, 0.8207620978355408, 0.8846359252929688, 0.8090535402297974, 0.8911325335502625, 0.7781831622123718, 0.8944075703620911, 0.8651426434516907, 0.9067487120628357, 0.9062270522117615, 0.9061874747276306, 0.9056609869003296, 0.8864023089408875, 0.9032741189002991, 0.8640052080154419, 0.8884585499763489, 0.96678227186203, 0.8261196613311768, 0.8913649916648865, 0.8706920146942139, 0.8612750172615051, 0.8704174160957336, 0.9036465287208557, 0.8726229667663574, 0.874884307384491, 0.875642716884613, 0.912105143070221, 0.9151114225387573, 0.9129959940910339, 0.8788917660713196, 0.9156875610351562, 0.8694127798080444, 0.9055797457695007, 0.9378909468650818, 0.9110644459724426, 0.8761608004570007, 0.8653643727302551, 0.8770931363105774, 0.8484876751899719, 0.8604509234428406, 0.9093406796455383, 0.9089838266372681, 0.835091769695282, 0.8776600956916809, 0.9173664450645447, 0.7732487320899963, 0.8663219213485718, 0.8800603747367859, 0.8890939354896545, 0.8346357345581055, 0.8826408386230469, 0.8900063633918762, 0.8645146489143372, 0.8235194087028503, 0.9080666303634644, 0.8494459986686707, 0.8872207999229431, 0.9112094044685364, 0.8920908570289612, 0.9132648706436157, 0.9115287661552429, 0.8390316367149353, 0.85475093126297, 0.8136187195777893, 0.8365971446037292, 0.8571756482124329, 0.8217710852622986, 0.8742868304252625, 0.8300138115882874, 0.873310387134552, 0.8669062256813049, 0.8933972716331482, 0.8990907073020935, 0.8354672789573669, 0.7958471179008484, 0.8211820721626282, 0.8815553784370422, 0.8685654401779175, 0.9109378457069397, 0.899644136428833, 0.8931573033332825, 0.8759936094284058, 0.8556404113769531, 0.8758959174156189, 0.8787338137626648, 0.8566797375679016, 0.889401376247406, 0.8973000645637512, 0.8612045645713806, 0.85611891746521, 0.939198911190033, 0.8394281268119812, 0.9245686531066895, 0.9091832041740417, 0.9274869561195374, 0.8417866826057434, 0.8585026860237122, 0.8359668254852295, 0.9528734087944031, 0.8114944100379944, 0.9464858770370483, 0.9032467007637024, 0.9170480370521545, 0.8916217684745789, 0.8398702144622803, 0.8729218244552612, 0.8953889608383179, 0.8757381439208984, 0.8488336205482483, 0.8606611490249634, 0.8984602689743042, 0.90137779712677, 0.8359902501106262, 0.8101087212562561, 0.904390275478363, 0.9212872385978699, 0.8609861135482788, 0.8142201900482178, 0.9235066175460815, 0.8694289326667786, 0.8538967370986938, 0.9058829545974731, 0.8815414309501648, 0.8772913217544556, 0.9100440740585327, 0.8181628584861755, 0.8659056425094604, 0.8748664259910583, 0.8740672469139099, 0.9326747059822083, 0.8988475203514099, 0.7725998163223267, 0.9538995623588562, 0.9189128279685974, 0.8964374661445618, 0.8620956540107727, 0.9102261662483215, 0.9002003073692322, 0.854531466960907, 0.9249409437179565, 0.9114101529121399, 0.8835723400115967, 0.9113115668296814, 0.8942732214927673, 0.7897172570228577, 0.8894089460372925, 0.8893113732337952, 0.8866137862205505, 0.903851330280304, 0.8697454929351807, 0.8894349932670593, 0.8556837439537048, 0.8418166637420654, 0.8806539177894592, 0.8475486636161804, 0.8748359084129333, 0.8695518970489502, 0.9324571490287781, 0.9039997458457947, 0.9125449061393738, 0.9211841821670532, 0.954201877117157, 0.918481171131134, 0.897216260433197, 0.8365383744239807, 0.8660284280776978, 0.908012866973877, 0.8844586610794067, 0.8593019843101501, 0.9091878533363342, 0.8585244417190552, 0.8572757840156555, 0.8698716759681702, 0.920656144618988, 0.875500500202179, 0.8974334001541138, 0.8950182795524597, 0.9386836290359497, 0.8777658939361572, 0.9308416247367859, 0.8293968439102173, 0.8680345416069031, 0.9113993048667908, 0.8799927830696106, 0.9433110356330872, 0.861391007900238, 0.8897838592529297, 0.8082699179649353, 0.8627533912658691, 0.848105251789093, 0.9149289727210999, 0.8805062174797058, 0.7505776286125183, 0.8505603671073914, 0.8822456002235413, 0.9046514630317688, 0.8811366558074951, 0.8769378662109375, 0.9581565856933594, 0.861261248588562, 0.8339335322380066, 0.8855286240577698, 0.9137336611747742, 0.8730741739273071, 0.8973597884178162, 0.882507860660553, 0.87492436170578, 0.9063815474510193, 0.8398095369338989, 0.7263608574867249, 0.9165073037147522, 0.8903667330741882, 0.9099384546279907, 0.8886926770210266, 0.932344913482666, 0.8530834317207336, 0.9140267968177795, 0.9400072693824768, 0.8983734250068665, 0.8476898670196533, 0.9119582176208496, 0.8572279810905457, 0.9235168695449829, 0.8659815788269043, 0.8906280398368835, 0.8713022470474243, 0.7988712191581726, 0.9028595685958862, 0.9396670460700989, 0.7971417307853699, 0.8688094019889832, 0.8945510983467102]}